Skip Links U.S. Department of State
Home Contact Us Email this Page FOIA Privacy Notice Archive
Search __________ Go
U.S. Department of State [i_spcr08.gif] About the State Dept.
Press and Public Affairs Travel and Living Abroad Countries and Regions International Issues History, Education and Culture Business Center Other Services Employment
[Print Friendly Version]
U.S. Government Assistance to and Cooperative Activities with Eurasia -FY 2002 Released by the Bureau of European and Eurasian Affairs January 2003 IV.
Assessments of Progress in Meeting the Standards of Section 498A of the Foreign Assistance Act of 1961
CRITERIA FOR U.S. ASSISTANCE UNDER SECTION 498A a) OF THE FOREIGN ASSISTANCE ACT OF 1961
ARMENIA
Section 201 of the FREEDOM Support Act amended Section 498A of the Foreign Assistance Act of 1961 to require that the President "take into account not only relative need but also the extent to which that independent state is acting to:"
Section 498A(a)(1): "make significant progress toward, and is committed to the comprehensive implementation of, a democratic system based on principles of the rule of law, individual freedoms, and representative government determined by free and fair elections."
The Armenian government has stated its commitment to building a parliamentary democracy based on rule of law and civil society.
However, serious problems remain.
The Armenian constitution was adopted by referendum in July 1995, coincident with the election of a transitional 190-member legislature.
The parliamentary elections and constitutional referendum were called "generally free but not fair" by international observers.
Presidential elections were held in 1996 and 1998.
Fraud in the 1996 vote tabulation process allowed then-incumbent President Ter-Petrossian to avoid a run-off election he might have lost.
In February 1998, Ter-Petrossian was forced to resign.
Current President Kocharian took office in April 1998, following elections that were marred by numerous irregularities, including block voting by the military and ballot box stuffing, which cast doubt on the voting and vote-counting processes.
Nevertheless, the 1998 elections were an improvement over those of 1996 in that a pluralistic group of candidates was able to campaign more freely, and with access to the media.
Elections in May 1999 for a restructured 131-member Parliament demonstrated some areas of improvement over previous elections as well as continuing serious shortcomings.
Improvements included the authorities' respect for freedom of speech and assembly, parties' and candidates' ability to enter the race and campaign freely, the neutrality of media coverage, and the functioning of domestic election observers.
Notable shortcomings were the poor state of voter lists (which kept many people from casting ballots), problems with military voting, insufficiently independent election commissions, and problems with the tabulation and publication of vote counts.
On October 27, 1999, five gunmen murdered the Prime Minister, the Speaker of the National Assembly, and six other officials in the parliament chamber.
Selection of successors followed constitutional requirements and several by-elections since that time showed further improvement in electoral procedures and fairness.
Accuracy of voter lists continued to be a problem in the October 2002 local and municipal elections, although legal procedures for election-day additions to the list have been made simpler and faster.
In looking toward the February 2003 presidential elections, at least 15 of the opposition parties in Armenia have signed a Memorandum of Understanding in which they pledge to do what is in their power to promote free and fair elections.
The constitution provides for freedom of the press, but the government exercises some restrictions on the media.
Official censorship is not practiced, but journalists appear to engage in self-censorship to avoid problems with authorities.
Many subjects considered sensitive for national security reasons receive circumscribed coverage.
The government maintains the dominant role in nationwide television and radio broadcasting, and national TV provides very favorable coverage to the President and Government, with limited access to and coverage of the political opposition.
Non-governmental media by contrast often criticize the country's leaders and government policies.
A media law passed in November 2000 substantially reduces government control over the media, but still left some loopholes that are cause for concern.
In a step back from the development of independent media, in September 2001 and again in April 2002, two prominent independent television stations lost their licenses in a tendering process required by the new media law.
Fourteen laws designed to improve the legal and judicial systems took effect in January 1999 but have not completely remedied judicial shortcomings.
Even though the prosecutors' supervision of cases has been significantly reduced, prosecutors still greatly overshadow defense lawyers and judges during trials.
In addition, serious concerns remain regarding the independence of the judiciary, the functioning of the legal system, and police treatment of detainees.
The beating of pretrial detainees remains a routine part of criminal investigations.
The government has not conducted investigations of abuse by security forces, except in rare cases where death has resulted and under pressure from human rights groups.
The Government of Armenia, with the help of the World Bank and an international working group chaired by the OSCE, is developing a comprehensive anti-corruption strategy.
Upon its adoption, the U.S. Government and other donors will consider contributions to the effort.
Some public demonstrations occur without government interference.
However, the government detained about 80 people at a rally in May 2002 protesting closure of an independent television station.
Section 498A(a)(2): "make significant progress in, and is committed to the comprehensive implementation of, economic reform based on market principles, private ownership, and integration into the world economy, including implementation of the legal and policy frameworks necessary for such reform (including protection of intellectual property and respect for contracts)."
Since 1994, Armenia has pursued macroeconomic stability and structural reform, with the support of international financial institutions and donors.
Growth was strong in 2001, at 9.6 percent, while inflation was moderate at 3.0 percent for the year.
Armenia has succeeded in privatizing almost all agricultural land and housing stock.
An aggressive voucher privatization program placed approximately 70 percent of Armenia's enterprises in private hands by 1997.
The Government of Armenia estimates that 80 percent of output the economy is now produced by the private sector.
The electrical power distribution net was privatized by sale to a Channel Islands-registered company in September 2002 in a non-transparent process .Most of the thermal power company was turned over to Russian control as part of a debt-for-equity swap aimed at paying off Armenia's large remaining debt payments to Russia, some of which dated to the break-up of the USSR.
Armenia is working to establish legal and institutional frameworks that will facilitate further economic development and foster an environment attractive to foreign investment.
A liberal foreign investment law was approved in 1994.
Armenia has a bilateral trade agreement providing for reciprocal Normal Trade Relations with the U.S. and has been determined to be compliant with the freedom of emigration provisions of the Jackson-Vanik amendment (subject to a semi-annual reporting requirement on its continued compliance with these provisions.
Armenia also has an OPIC agreement, and a bilateral investment treaty with the United States.
After long negotiations and hard work, Armenia acceded to the WTO in December 2002.
Compliance with WTO obligations required that the Government of Armenia adopt extensive legislation changes (including amendments to the customs code and copyright law).
Armenia has also expressed interest in negotiating a bilateral tax treaty with the United States, and is receiving U.S. technical assistance in revising its tax structure.
Armenia belongs to the International Monetary Fund, the World Bank, and the European Bank for Reconstruction and Development.
Section 498A(a)(3): "respect internationally recognized human rights, including the rights of minorities and the rights to freedom of religion and emigration."
Armenia's 1995 constitution contains broad human rights protections.
Implementation, however, has been inconsistent and serious problems persist in several important areas.
The constitution grants national minorities the right to preserve their cultural traditions and languages, and current law specifically provides linguistic minorities the right to publish and study in their native tongues.
Armenia has ratified important international human rights treaties and shown a willingness to engage in international and bilateral discussions regarding human rights.
The constitution provides for the right to practice the religion of one's choice, but current laws grant special status to the Armenian Apostolic Church, which has legal status as the national church.
All other religious denominations and organizations must register with the state Council on Religious Affairs.
Although only the Armenian Apostolic Church may by law proselytize, in practice, there have been no restrictions imposed on most other religious bodies.
Funding from sources outside Armenia is prohibited for non-apostolic faiths.
The State Council on Religions, which from 1996 on regulated the relations of religious denominations with the Government, was abolished by presidential decree in March 2002 and was replaced in August 2002 by a committee attached to the Prime Minister's office.
As of November 2002, registered religious groups had reported neither adverse consequences from the law nor denial of re-registration under the amended law.
Although Jehovah's Witnesses have not been allowed to register as a religious denomination, the group operates in a fairly open manner.
Despite being harassed by local officials and denied access to their religious publications, they report gains in converts.
In 2002, several Jehovah's Witnesses were in jail charged with draft evasion or desertion.
In June 2001, President Kocharian granted amnesty to 38, but around 30 remain detained in November 2002.
The Council of Europe maintains that those imprisoned for conscientious objection must be released immediately as part of a government undertaking to join the Council of Europe, committing to enact legislation to provide alternative military service within the next two years.
The Government maintains that those presently in prison do not have to be released until the new laws are passed.
Two different drafts are currently circulating in Parliament.
In September 2001, an Armenian court found a senior Jehovahs Witness official innocent of all charges brought against him under a Soviet-era anti-religion law, and appeals of the case by the Prosecutor General's office to an appeals court and to the Court of Cassation, Armenia's highest appeals court, were dismissed in 2002, allowing the Jehovah's Witnesses official to be freed.
The constitution provides for freedom of foreign travel and emigration, and these rights are generally recognized in practice.
A 1997 law mandates that representatives of religious organizations other than the Armenian Apostolic Church must obtain prior permission from the State Council on Religions to travel abroad.
However, this requirement has not been enforced since the initial year of its enactment.
Since independence in 1991, upwards of one million Armenian citizens, approximately one-fourth of the population at independence, have emigrated or reside semi-permanently outside the Republic of Armenia.
Discrimination based on race, sex, religion, disability, language, or social status is prohibited by the Constitution, but cultural and economic factors prevent women, persons with disabilities, and some ethnic and religious minorities from participating fully in public life.
Section 498A(a)(4): "respect international law and obligations and adhere to the Helsinki Final Act of the Conference on Security and Cooperation in Europe and the Charter of Paris, including the obligations to refrain from the threat or use of force and to settle disputes peacefully."
In November 1999, Armenia joined the other OSCE states in signing the Charter for European Security, which reaffirms full adherence to all OSCE documents already in force.
However, Armenia does not recognize the borders of Azerbaijan as defined in OSCE documents at the time of accession.
Armenia facilitated the opening of an OSCE office in Yerevan in 2000.
As a result of the continuing conflict over Nagorno-Karabakh, Armenian military forces occupy a portion of the territory of Azerbaijan.
Both Armenia and Azerbaijan periodically violate the cease-fire that has been in effect since May 1994; both countries participate actively within the OSCE Minsk Process, an initiative aimed at resolving the conflict.
President Kocharian and Azerbaijani President Aliyev have engaged in bilateral talks for several years whose goal is a negotiated settlement of the conflict.
In 2002, they met in Sadarak, Azerbaijan, in August; in Chisinau, Moldova, in October; and in Prague in November.
Their foreign and defense ministers also have met several times to discuss aspects of a settlement, and in 2002, special representatives of the two Presidents met several times, opening yet another negotiating track.
Through the auspices of the OSCE, Armenia and Azerbaijan continued in 2002 to exchange POWs.
Section 498A(a)(5): "cooperate in seeking peaceful resolution of ethnic and regional conflicts."
The OSCE created the Minsk Group in spring 1992 as the forum for a peaceful, negotiated resolution to the conflict over Nagorno-Karabakh.
The Government of Armenia continues its participation in the OSCE peace process.
There has also been intermittent direct dialogue between the Armenian and Azerbaijani governments.
This dialogue and the Minsk Group process continue to hold the promise of achieving comprehensive settlement of the conflict.
Section 498A(a)(6): "implement responsible security policies, including--
(A) adhering to arms control obligations derived from agreements signed by the former Soviet Union;
(B) reducing military forces and expenditures to a level consistent with legitimate defense requirements;
(C) not proliferating nuclear, biological, or chemical weapons, their delivery systems, or related technologies; and
(D) restraining conventional weapons transfers."
Armenia ratified the Conventional Forces in Europe (CFE) Treaty in October 1992 and the 1996 CFE flank agreement in May 1996.
Armenia participated actively in negotiations to adapt the Treaty and, along with the other 29 CFE states, its representatives signed the Adapted CFE Treaty at the Istanbul Summit in 1999.
Armenia has provided data on equipment as required by the Treaty.
Armenia also has hosted on-site inspections, as provided for in the Treaty, and participates in the CFE Joint Consultative Group, the Treaty's implementation body, which meets in Vienna.
Armenian compliance with CFE has been uneven.
In addition to Armenia's longstanding failure to properly notify or carry out reductions required by the Treaty, there have been technical concerns about the completeness of Armenia's data on equipment holdings.
Also of concern are: evidence that Armenia may have failed to notify increases in unit holdings involving CFE Treaty limited equipment transferred from Russia, the fact that Armenia continues to station troops and CFE limited equipment on the territory of Azerbaijan without Azerbaijani permission, and evidence that Armenia made a late notification of the entry into service of multiple rocket launchers purchased from China.
Another area of concern is possible transfers in the mid-1990s of CFE-type military equipment to separatist forces in Nagorno-Karabakh.
Both Armenia and Azerbaijan have maintained that it is impossible for them to meet certain Treaty obligations because of security concerns associated with the Nagorno-Karabakh conflict.
This said, Armenia is engaged in discussions both in the CFE context and in the context of the Minsk Group process which may help to address certain of these issues.
Armenia is a participating State to the OSCE Vienna Document 1999 and its predecessor Vienna Document 1994.
The Vienna Document is an OSCE regime of confidence and security building measures.
Armenia submitted CSBM annual data declarations for 1996-2000 and has willingly undergone CSBM inspections and evaluation visits in accordance with the OSCE Vienna Document (1994 and 1999).
In August 2000, Armenia hosted an air base visit and visit to a military facility in accordance with Vienna Document 1999 provisions.
In September 2002 it hosted a joint exercise in mountain rescue techniques with the U.S., Georgia and Russia, to which Turkey and Azerbaijan were also invited, and in spring 2003 will host a PFP ground forces exercise.
Armenia acceded to the Nuclear Nonproliferation Treaty (NPT) as a non-nuclear-weapons state on July 15, 1993.
It has had a full-scope safeguards agreement in force with the International Atomic Energy Agency since May 5, 1994.
The United States and other Western governments have discussed efforts to establish effective export control systems with Armenia.
Armenia is a State Party to the Chemical Weapons Convention (CWC) and the Biological Weapons Convention (BWC), which seek to eliminate chemical and biological weapons, respectively.
Armenia provided an annual voluntary BWC-related CBM Data Declaration the past four out of five years, including in 2001.
Armenia also signed a bilateral nonproliferation and export control agreement with the United States in July 2000.
It has approved the agreement and exchanged formal notifications with the United States to bring the agreement into force.
Additionally, Armenia has acknowledged it is a successor to the former Soviet Unions obligations under the Immediate Range Nuclear Forces (INF) Treaty and continues to observe the Treatys obligations.
We have received occasional reports of transfers from Armenia potentially related to proliferation of weapons of mass destruction technology or equipment, which we carefully review and pursue in light of the global war on terror, our efforts on Iraq/other states that sponsor terrorism and our legal obligations under the various nonproliferation sanctions laws.
Based on U.S. diplomatic efforts in 2002, Armenia worked cooperatively with the United States Government to stop and detain a shipment of dual-use equipment originating in Armenia that was destined for Iran.
On May 9, 2002, the U.S. imposed sanctions on two Armenian entities Lizin Open Joint Stock Company and Armenian national Armen Sargasian pursuant to the Iran Nonproliferation Act for the transfer of Australia Group-controlled items to Iran in the second half of 2001.
The Armenian government also worked with the USG to ensure transparency regarding this matter.
Armenia is in the process of establishing a WMD-related export control system based on international standards and has worked with the United States and other countries toward this goal.
Armenia is not a significant exporter of conventional weapons, but has provided substantial support, including materiel, to separatists in the Nagorno-Karabakh region of Azerbaijan.
It provided both ammunition and weapons to support the U.S. led effort train and equip the new Afghan National Army as part of Armenia's participation in Operation Enduring Freedom.
Section 498A(a)(7): "take constructive actions to protect the international environment, prevent significant transborder pollution, and promote sustainable use of natural resources."
Armenia faces serious environmental problems.
Water pollution caused by industrial wastes discharged into rivers has contributed to a serious decline in public health.
Armenia's major freshwater lake, Lake Sevan, has a declining water level due to use of its water for irrigation and hydroelectric generation.
Overuse of the country's forests and poor irrigation and water management practices have led to increased soil erosion and loss of arable land.
The Government of Armenia, however, has taken some steps to establish public policy mechanisms to address environmental issues, including the establishment of a Ministry of Environment.
Environmental action plans are being developed with the assistance of the World Bank.
National environmental NGOs are gaining access to the policy-making process on environmental issues.
Armenia has shown an interest in regional cooperation on environmental issues, and has agreed to the establishment of a coordination and information-sharing mechanism as a first step toward fuller cooperation on transborder and international environmental issues.
In 2000, Armenia joined Georgia in signing the charter for and establishing the Regional Environmental Center in the Caucasus, located in Tbilisi, Georgia.
The United States and the European Union are supporting and co-financing the establishment of this independent, non-profit, and non-political organization, the mission of which will be to strengthen civil society and support sustainable development by promoting public awareness and participation in regional environmental decision-making.
Section 498A(a)(8): "deny support for acts of international terrorism."
The Government of Armenia does not grant sanctuary from prosecution to individuals or groups that have committed acts of international terrorism or otherwise support international terrorism.
Armenia is party to two of the twelve UN International Terrorism Conventions and signed one more.
In November 2002, Armenia introduced a terrorist financing law that allows Armenian banks to question the source of cash deposits and to freeze accounts of individuals and organizations suspected of terrorist financing.
Allegations in the Turkish and Azeri media that the government of Armenia supports anti-Turkish Armenian and Kurdish terrorist groups remain unsubstantiated.
The PKK (now Kadek) however, does have a presence in Armenia.
In October 2001, several hundred PKK supporters attempted to demonstrate in front of the U.S. Embassy but were prevented from doing so by local authorities.
Armenian President Kocharian has pledged full support for the United States' efforts against terrorism and has offered intelligence support, overflight and landing rights, additional security support to U.S. facilities in Armenia during times of terrorist alert, and emergency medical assistance to U.S. troops that operate in Armenia.
Armenia also offered weapons and ammunition to the new Afghan National Army.
Section 498A(a)(9): "accept responsibility for paying an equitable portion of the indebtedness to United States firms incurred by the former Soviet Union."
In October 1991, shortly before the Soviet Union dissolved, Russia and nine other Soviet republics signed a Memorandum of Understanding declaring themselves jointly and severally liable for the foreign debts of the former Soviet Union (FSU).
In December 1991, Russia and seven other republics, including Armenia, signed an agreement which assigned to each of the newly independent states a share of all the external assets and foreign debt of the former Soviet Union.
Beginning in 1992, Russia sought to replace the joint and several liability principle by seeking full liability for the debt in return for all the external assets.
In September 1993, Armenia signed a "double zero option" agreement with Russia under which Russia agreed to assume Armenia's share of the former Soviet Union's foreign debts in exchange for Armenia's share of the FSU's external assets.
Please see section 498A(a)(9) of the Russia FSA report regarding indebtedness to the United States incurred by the former Soviet Union.
Section 498A(a)(10): "cooperate with the United States Government in uncovering all evidence regarding Americans listed as prisoners-of-war, or otherwise missing during American operations, who were detained in the former Soviet Union during the Cold War."
The U.S. effort to uncover evidence of American POWs and MIAs in the former Soviet Union is being conducted through the U.S. - Russia Joint Commission on POWs/MIAs which was established in March 1992.
The U.S. side of the Commission visited Armenia in August 1993 to expand contacts with Armenian officials and to visit the crash site of a C-130 that was shot down over Armenia in 1958.
The delegation received much support from the people and officials of Armenia, who cooperated during the investigation.
Section 498A(a)(11): "terminate support for the communist regime in Cuba, including removal of troops, closing military and intelligence facilities, including the military and intelligence facilities at Lourdes and Cienfuegos, and ceasing trade subsidies and economic, nuclear, and other assistance."
We have no evidence from which to conclude that the Government of Armenia is providing military, intelligence, economic, nuclear, or other assistance to the Government of Cuba.
CHECKLIST FOR GROUNDS OF INELIGIBILITY UNDER SECTION 498A(b) OF THE FOREIGN ASSISTANCE ACT OF 1961 ARMENIA
Section 498A(b)(1): Has the President determined that the Government of Armenia has "engaged in a consistent pattern of gross violations of internationally recognized human rights or of international law"?
No.
While there have been shortcomings in human rights observance (as discussed above), we do not believe that the government of Armenia is engaged in such a pattern.
Section 498A(b)(2): Has the President determined that the Government of Armenia "has failed to take constructive actions to facilitate the effective implementation of applicable arms control obligations derived from agreements signed by the former Soviet Union"?
No.
We do not believe that the government of Armenia has failed to take such actions.
Section 498A(b)(3): Has the President determined that, after October 24, 1992, the Government of Armenia "knowingly transferred to another country --
(A) missiles or missile technology inconsistent with the guidelines and parameters of the Missile Technology Control Regime; or
(B) any material, equipment, or technology that would contribute significantly to the ability of such country to manufacture any weapon of mass destruction (including nuclear, chemical, and biological weapons) if the President determine[d] that the material, equipment, or technology was to be used by such country in the manufacture of such weapon"?
No such determinations have been made during the reporting period.
Section 498A(b)(4): Is the Government of Armenia "prohibited from receiving such assistance by section 101 or 102 of the Arms Export Control Act or sections 306(a)(1) and 307 of the Chemical and Biological Weapons Control and Warfare Elimination Act of 1991"?
No.
We do not have information from which to conclude that the government of Armenia is prohibited from receiving assistance under these sections.
Section 498A(b)(5): Has the President determined and certified to the appropriate congressional committees that the Government of Armenia "is providing assistance for, or engaging in non-market-based trade (as defined in section 498B(k)(3)) with the Cuban Government? If so, has the President taken action to withhold assistance from Armenia under the Foreign Assistance Act within 30 days of such a determination, or has Congress enacted legislation disapproving the determination within that 30-day period?"
No.
The President has not determined that the Government of Armenia is providing assistance for, or engaging in any non-market-based trade with, the Cuban government.
CRITERIA FOR U.S. ASSISTANCE UNDER SECTION 498A(a)OF THE FOREIGN ASSISTANCE ACT OF 1961
AZERBAIJAN
Section 201 of the FREEDOM Support Act amended Section 498A of the Foreign Assistance Act of 1961 to require that the President "take into account not only relative need but also the extent to which that independent state is acting to:"
Section 498A(a)(1): "make significant progress toward, and is committed to the comprehensive implementation of, a democratic system based on principles of the rule of law, individual freedoms, and representative government determined by free and fair elections."
Azerbaijans efforts toward integration with the West have brought it into NATO's Euro-Atlantic Partnership Council and engagement with the European Union.
Significant problems remain, however.
A parliamentary republic, Azerbaijans politics is dominated by incumbent President Heydar Aliyev.
Parliament has been dominated by the ruling New Azerbaijan Party since Aliyev came to power in 1993 and opposition parties make up only a small minority of its members.
Elections since 1993 have not met OSCE standards.
The Constitution provides for an independent judiciary, but in practice judges do not function independently of the executive branch.
In August of 2002 Azerbaijan conducted a referendum on constitutional amendments proposed by the Government.
The vote was marred by serious and widespread irregularities.
These included instances of voter list fraud, multiple voting, voter intimidation and ballot box stuffing.
Furthermore, at least in some precincts where U.S. and other international monitors were present, the vote totals greatly exceeded the level of participation actually observed.
Fifty percent turn-out was needed to validate the referendum results.
The Central Election Commissions assertions that turnout was at eighty-four percent, and that from ninety-five to ninety-six percent of the voters approved each of the eight items on the ballot, do not appear to be credible.
An active and independent media exists and press censorship was officially abolished in 1998.
Nevertheless, government harassment continues and increased in 2002, including the arrest of journalists, libel suits and questionable tax inspections.
Two regional stations remain closed due to their lack of licensing.
The Government tightly controls official radio and television, the primary source of information for most of the population.
There are several major opposition parties, which are allowed to operate although members are subject to harassment by the authorities.
Opposition parties are routinely harassed by the authorities.
Some domestic human rights NGOs have reported that the Government holds between 200-300 political prisoners.
Other groups claimed the number to be much higher.
Presidential pardons in 2002 resulted in the release of some of these prisoners.
Section 498A(a)(2): "make significant progress in, and is committed to the comprehensive implementation of, economic reform based on market principles, private ownership, and integration into the world economy, including implementation of the legal and policy frameworks necessary for such reform (including protection of intellectual property and respect for contracts)."
Since gaining independence, Azerbaijan has made important progress in the transition to a market economy.
Outdated Soviet laws have been replaced with modern legislation to encourage foreign investment, to protect intellectual property, to permit bankruptcies, and to rationalize the government's revenue collection policies.
Azerbaijan is a member of the International Bank for Reconstruction and Development (IBRD), European Bank for Reconstruction and Development (EBRD), International Monetary Fund (IMF) and the Asian Development Bank.
The U.S. government's business promotion agencies TDA, EXIM and OPIC are active in Azerbaijan.
Azerbaijan is making modest progress in preparing for WTO membership.
Azerbaijan has a bilateral trade agreement with the U.S., providing for reciprocal Normal Trade Relations, and has been determined to be compliant with the freedom of emigration provisions of the Jackson-Vanik amendment (subject to a semi-annual reporting requirement on its continued compliance with these provisions).
The U.S.-Azerbaijan bilateral investment treaty (BIT) entered into force in August 2001.
Azerbaijan also has an OPIC agreement.
The oil industry is Azerbaijan's financial lifeline.
Twenty-one signed Production Sharing Agreements (PSAs) with 33 international companies attest to the rapid development of Azerbaijan's energy sector, which has attracted 75-80 percent of the more than $5 billion in foreign direct investment (FDI) made through 2000.
Progress continues on key regional energy transportation projects such as the Baku-Tbilisi-Ceyhan oil pipeline and the Baku-Tbilisi-Erzerum gas pipeline.
These projects will form the backbone of an East-West transportation corridor that will carry Caspian energy resources to western markets and help insure the independence of participating states.
However, the Government of Azerbaijan has had a mixed record on implementing structural reforms, especially in the oil sector.
Economic development outside the energy sector has been incremental.
In the area of land reform, the Government of Azerbaijan succeeded in implementing a land privatization program and placed 97.2 percent of agricultural lands into private hands, which helped reverse the collapse in agricultural production and contributed to growth in the agricultural sector in each of the past 5 years.
The private sector now generates 99 percent of total agricultural production, a huge transformation from the previous collectivized approach to agriculture.
Privatization of industry has been less successful.
Although Azerbaijan privatized more than 22,000 small state enterprises and reorganized 996 larger enterprises as stock organizations as part of a first privatization program begun in 1996, the lack of adequate preparation and a reluctance to accept worker dislocation has hampered attempts to privatize larger state enterprises.
After receiving poor marks for earlier privatization of large enterprises, Azerbaijan undertook in August 2000 a second privatization program focused on privatizing larger state enterprises.
The results thus far have not been encouraging.
Until restructuring and privatization of many large state-owned enterprises occurs, Azerbaijan will continue to be saddled with a largely obsolete and inefficient (non-energy) industrial base.
In contrast to its track record on microeconomic reform, Azerbaijan has received praise from the IMF for achieving macroeconomic stability.
Under the Aliyev administration, Azerbaijan adopted a conservative stance on the assumption of debt, rather than engaging in the spending sprees that often follow natural resource booms.
This conservative attitude resulted in a public debt/GDP ratio of about 25 percent in 2002 and, combined with tight monetary policies, helped the Government of Azerbaijan rein in inflation from 1,664 percent in 1994 to 2.5 percent in 2001.
In July 2001, the Government of Azerbaijan reached agreement with the IMF on a three-year, $100 million Poverty Reduction and Growth Facility.
At the urging of the international financial institutions, the Government of Azerbaijan established a State Oil Fund to save and manage its growing energy revenues.
The fund, which began operating in January 2001, should have approximately $ 480 million in assets by year's end.
Planned initial expenditures of approximately $18 million have been directed at construction of homes for internally displaced persons and refugees.
Prudent and transparent management of the Oil Fund remains a key issue between the IMF and GOA.
Section 498A(a)(3): "respect for internationally recognized human rights, including the rights of minorities and the rights to freedom of religion and emigration."
The Governments human rights record remains poor.
As part of its application to join the Council of Europe, Azerbaijan passed several progressive acts of legislation to replace outdated Soviet legal codes.
The institutions required to implement these new laws, however, are weak, and implementation has faced difficulties.
The new criminal code bans torture but local human rights NGOs credibly report that authorities have tortured suspects to extract confessions.
Perpetrators often go unpunished although there were a handful of prosecutions and reprimands over the past year.
Local and international human rights groups continue to visit prisons and meet regularly with some political prisoners.
However, some domestic human rights organizations complained that the authorities restricted their access to prisons during the year.
One area where Azerbaijan had made significant progress until 2002 was in the sphere of religious freedom.
Although "traditional" religious groups Muslims, Russian Orthodox Christians and Jews -- are respected, harassment of other, "non-traditional" groups by lower-level officials occurs from time to time.
Following President Aliyev's public commitment to religious freedom in late 1999, the government redressed most individual cases of harassment and registered several non-traditional religious groups.
The establishment of a state commission regulating religious associations in June 2001, however, has required that all religious groups re-submit their registration documents.
There have been considerable delays in registration and some denials.
Several Protestant congregations of separate churches were denied registration when they refused to accept the State's plan for organizing themselves into a common union with a particular church at the head.
Although most religious groups have continued to operate while their re-registration is pending, at least one of the churches told to organize along such lines has been closed.
There have also been problems with importing religious materials.
Some Muslim groups have reported government interference in their affairs.
Some Muslim communities have complained of authorities denying permission for female students and teachers to wear Muslim head coverings.
A troubling development for which government officials must share some responsibility, is continuing television broadcasts defaming several Christian religious groups.
The government respects the right of freedom of emigration, including Jewish emigration.
The remaining Armenian population in Azerbaijan is approximately 10,000-30,000, almost exclusively persons of mixed descent or mixed marriages.
While official government policy is that ethnic Armenians are free to travel, low-level officials seeking bribes have harassed citizens of Armenian ethnicity who sought to obtain passports.
There are approximately 800,000 Azerbaijani refugees and IDPs from the war with Armenia.
Armenians have settled in parts of Azerbaijan they occupy and Azerbaijanis are unable to return.
Section 498A(a)(4): "respect international law and obligations and adhere to the Helsinki Final Act of the Conference on Security and Cooperation in Europe and the Charter of Paris, including the obligations to refrain from the threat or use of force and to settle disputes peacefully."
Azerbaijan has reiterated its commitment to the observance of international legal obligations and OSCE commitments in the area of human rights.
It has also reiterated its commitment to seek a peaceful resolution of the Nagorno-Karabakh conflict.
At the same time, the Nagorno-Karabakh conflict remains unresolved, and both sides have committed violations of international humanitarian laws.
The parties to the conflict observe a cease-fire that has been in effect since May 1994, although violations by both sides are common.
In 2002 the Presidents of Azerbaijan and Armenia met several times in an effort to resolve their differences and bring about a resolution of the conflict.
2002 also saw the opening of a new, additional negotiating track of meetings by special representatives of the two presidents.
Through the auspices of the OSCE, Armenia and Azerbaijan continued in 2002 to exchange POWs.
In November 1999, Azerbaijan joined the other OSCE states in signing the Charter for European Security, which reaffirms full adherence to all OSCE documents already in force.
Section 498A(a)(5): "cooperate in seeking peaceful resolution of ethnic and regional conflicts."
The OSCE created the Minsk Group in the spring of 1992 as the forum for a peaceful, negotiated resolution to the conflict over Nagorno-Karabakh.
The government of Azerbaijan participates fully in the OSCE peace process.
In 2002, the Presidents of Azerbaijan and Armenia continued to engage in a series of private meetings in an effort to resolve their differences and help bring about a resolution of the conflict.
Both Azerbaijan and Armenia have also expressed a commitment to continue working with the OSCE Minsk Group Co-Chairs to achieve a resolution of the conflict.
Section 498A(a)(6): "implement responsible security policies, including--
(A) adhering to arms control obligations derived from agreements signed by the former Soviet Union;
(B) reducing military forces and expenditures to a level consistent with legitimate defense requirements;
(C) not proliferating nuclear, biological, or chemical weapons, their delivery systems, or related technologies; and
(D) restraining conventional weapons transfers."
Azerbaijan has declared its acceptance of all of the relevant arms control obligations of the former Soviet Union.
Azerbaijani actions to support this commitment include accession, as a non-nuclear weapons state weapons state, to the Nuclear Non-Proliferation Treaty.
Azerbaijans NPT safeguards agreement with the International Atomic Energy Agency has been in force since April 29, 1999.
Azerbaijan was one of the original signatories of the Convention on the Prohibition of the Development, Production, Stockpiling and Use of Chemical Weapons and on Their Destruction and deposited its instrument of ratification of Convention on February 29, 2000.
Azerbaijan has not acceded to the Convention on the Prohibition of the Development, Production and Stockpiling of Bacteriological (Biological) and Toxic Weapons and on Their Destruction.
The United States considers Azerbaijan to be a party to the INF Treaty as a successor state to the Soviet Union.
Although Azerbaijani officials have questioned that conclusion, they have taken no steps inconsistent with their obligations under INF.
The Conventional Armed Forces in Europe (CFE) Treaty was approved by Azerbaijan's Parliament in July 1992.
Until late in 1999, Azerbaijan had significant overages above its Treaty limits in equipment, but by a series of notifications of reduction events, and decommissioning, Azerbaijan stated they had been eliminated.
Azerbaijan's data as of November 27, 2001 showed compliance with all limits.
Two inspections (one in 1999 and one in 2000), however, have raised questions about the accuracy of specific points in Azerbaijan's data.
Azerbaijan's compliance with other CFE obligations has been uneven.
Azerbaijan participates in the CFE Joint Consultative Group, the Treaty's implementation body, which meets in Vienna.
Azerbaijan has hosted on-site inspections as provided for in the Treaty and has provided data on equipment as required by the Treaty.
However, since 1997 Azerbaijan has continued a unilateral suspension of certain notification provisions, although such a suspension is not allowed under CFE, citing the exigencies of the conflict in Nagorno-Karabakh.
Although Azerbaijan has not properly completed the reductions required by the Treaty, it has continued to periodically notify and carry out reduction events, completing the reduction of over 400 TLE out of a putative liability of over 1000.
Azerbaijan continues to insist that it cannot complete required reductions -- or fulfill certain Treaty obligations -- as long as the dispute over Nagorno-Karabakh continues with Armenian troops and equipment in occupied Azerbaijani territory.
Azerbaijan is engaged in discussions both in the CFE context and in the context of the Minsk process, which may help lay the basis for improved Treaty compliance.
Azerbaijan has submitted Confidence and Security Building Measures (CSBM) annual data declaration for 1996-2001 and has willingly undergone CSBM inspections and evaluation visits in accordance with the OSCE Vienna Document 1994 and its successor Vienna Document 1999.
We have no evidence that the government of Azerbaijan has engaged in the proliferation of nuclear, chemical, or biological weapons, their delivery systems, or related technology.
Azerbaijan has made progress in establishing a system of nonproliferation export controls and has actively moved to thwart transit of controlled items to countries of concern.
In September 1999, the USG and the Government of Azerbaijan signed an agreement "Concerning Cooperation in the Area of Counterproliferation of Weapons of Mass Destruction and Defense Activities."
The agreement, however, has yet to enter into force.
Azerbaijan supports the worldwide moratorium on nuclear testing, and was an original subscribing state to the November 22 2002 International Code of Conduct Against Ballistic Missile Proliferation.
Azerbaijan is not a significant exporter of conventional weapons.
Section 498A(a)(7): "take constructive actions to protect the international environment, prevent significant transborder pollution, and promote sustainable use of natural resources."
Soviet era oil development, air and water pollution, and urban industrial pressure on the land have created serious environmental challenges.
Deterioration and erosion of soil and salination of agricultural lands contribute to extensive soil loss.
Poor air and water quality contribute to increasing public health risks.
The rising level of the Caspian Sea and the prospective development of Caspian energy resources have brought serious new environmental challenges.
Azerbaijan acceded to the Convention on International Trade in Endangered Species on November 23, 1998; to the Basel Convention (on transboundary movement of hazardous waste) on June 1, 2001; and to the Kyoto Protocol on September 28, 2000.
Legislation to address environmental problems and the use of natural resources, based on modern Western practice, has been enacted, but funding remains inadequate to meet the breadth of existing problems.
International consortia currently drilling for oil and gas in the Caspian Sea are following international industry-wide environmental practices.
The government draws attention to environmental issues through its support of an annual International Environmental Congress that brings together government officials, scientists, politicians, international oil companies, and private organizations to address Caspian region development issues.
Azerbaijan also participates in the Caspian Environmental Program, a five-nation project supported by UNDP and the IBRD.
Under this project, Azerbaijan has established a pollution abatement research center and a database management center to help the littoral states protect the sensitive Caspian Sea environment.
In November 2001 the Caspian Environment Program sponsored a series of workshops on oil spill contingency planning which many hope will be a building block for Azerbaijan in a regional contingency plan for the littoral states.
In October 2001 the government combined five agencies into a new Ministry of Ecology and National Resources which is responsible for implementing the government's ecology policy.
In December 2000 Azerbaijan joined co-founders Georgia and Armenia in a Regional Environmental Center for the Caucasus.
The United States and the European Union are supporting and co-financing this independent, non-profit, and non-political organization, the mission of which is to strengthen civil society and support sustainable development by promoting public awareness and participation in regional environmental decision-making.
In November of 2001, the Ministry of Ecology advised that Azerbaijan had completed a national sustainable development plan.
Azerbaijan is participating in a three country USAID project on management of the Kura/Aras River, a river basin that encompasses Georgia, Azerbaijan and Armenia.
Section 498A(a)(8): "deny support for acts of international terrorism."
Azerbaijan is a staunch partner in the U.S.-led global war on terrorism.
It is a signatory to several major international anti-terrorism conventions and has cooperated with the U.S. and other countries on anti-terrorism efforts.
U.S.-Azerbaijan counterterrorism cooperation predates the September 11 attacks.
Azerbaijan provided evidence to U.S. authorities which contributed directly to the conviction of the 1998 East Africa Embassy bombers, and cooperates with the U.S. Embassy in Baku against terrorist threats to the mission.
In the wake of the September 11 attacks, the Government of Azerbaijan expressed unqualified support for the U.S. and offered whatever means necessary to the U.S.-led antiterrorism coalition.
To date, Azerbaijan has granted blanket overflight clearance, offered the use of bases, and engaged in information sharing and law enforcement cooperation.
In November of 2002 a platoon of Azerbaijani soldiers was deployed to the international peacekeeping force in Afghanistan.
Azerbaijan has taken steps to combat terrorist financing, making a concerted effort to identify and shut down groups engaged in terrorist-related funding.
Azerbaijan closed three Islamic organizations that were suspected of supporting terrorist groups.
It has taken steps to prevent the use of Azerbaijani territory by Chechen militants and those seeking to aid them.
Azerbaijan has also detained several persons crossing the Iran-Azerbaijan border illegally.
Azerbaijans Department of Aviation Security increased security at Baku's Bina Airport and has implemented International Civil Aviation Organization (ICAO) recommendations on aviation security.
Azerbaijan has turned over 30 foreign citizens with suspected ties to terrorists, including eight to Egypt and three to Saudi Arabia.
The government of Azerbaijan does not grant sanctuary from prosecution to individuals or groups that have committed actions of international terrorism or otherwise support international terrorism.
Section 498A(a)(9): "accept responsibility for paying an equitable portion of the indebtedness to United States firms incurred by the former Soviet Union."
In October 1991, shortly before the Soviet Union dissolved, Russia and nine other Soviet republics signed a Memorandum of Understanding declaring themselves jointly and severally liable for the foreign debts of the Soviet Union.
In December 1991, Russia and seven other republics signed an agreement that assigned to each of the newly independent states a share of all the external assets and foreign debt of the former Soviet Union (FSU).
Beginning in 1992, Russia sought to replace the joint and several liability principle by seeking full liability for the foreign debt of the FSU in return for all the external assets of the FSU.
In September 1993 Azerbaijan signed a "double zero option" agreement with Russia under which Russia agreed to pay Azerbaijans share of the foreign debt of the FSU in return for Azerbaijan's share of the external assets of the FSU.
Please see section 498A(a)(9) of the Russia FSA report regarding indebtedness to the United States incurred by the former Soviet Union.
Section 498A(a)(10): "cooperate with the United States government in uncovering all evidence regarding Americans listed as prisoners-of-war, or otherwise missing during American operations, who were detained in the former Soviet Union during the Cold War."
The U.S. effort to uncover evidence of American POWs and MIAs in the former Soviet Union is being conducted through the U.S.-Russian Joint Commission on POWs/MIAs, which was established in March 1992.
The Commission met with Azerbaijani officials in June 1996, and the Azerbaijani government pledged its cooperation with the Commission's efforts.
Section 498A(a)(11): "terminate support for the communist regime in Cuba, including removal of troops, closing of military and intelligence facilities, including the military and intelligence facilities at Lourdes and Cienfuegos, and ceasing trade subsidies and economic, nuclear, and other assistance."
We do not have information from which to conclude that the Government of Azerbaijan is providing military, intelligence, economic, nuclear, or other assistance to the Government of Cuba.
CHECKLIST FOR GROUNDS OF INELIGIBILITY UNDER SECTION 498A(b) OF THE FOREIGN ASSISTANCE ACT OF 1961
AZERBAIJAN
Section 498A(b)(1): Has the President determined that the Government of Azerbaijan has "engaged in a consistent pattern of gross violations of internationally recognized human rights or of international law"?
No.
While there have been serious shortcomings in human rights observance, we do not believe that the government of Azerbaijan is engaged in a pattern of gross violations of human rights or of international law.
Nonetheless, we will work to better address existing problems not only through our diplomatic efforts but also through our assistance programs.
Section 498A(b)(2): Has the President determined that the Government of Azerbaijan "has failed to take constructive actions to facilitate the effective implementation of applicable arms control obligations derived from agreements signed by the former Soviet Union"?
No.
We do not believe that the Government of Azerbaijan has failed to take such actions.
Section 498A(b)(3): Has the President determined that, after October 24, 1992, the Government of Azerbaijan "knowingly transferred to another country --
(A) missiles or missile technology inconsistent with the guidelines and parameters of the Missile Technology Control Regime; or
(B) any material, equipment, or technology that would contribute significantly to the ability of such country to manufacture any weapon of mass destruction (including nuclear, chemical, and biological weapons) if the President determine[d] that the material, equipment, or technology was to be used by such country in the manufacture of such weapon"?
No such determinations have been made during the reporting period.
Section 498A(b)(4): Is the Government of Azerbaijan "prohibited from receiving such assistance by section 101 or 102 of the Arms Export Control Act or sections 306(a)(1) and 307 of the Chemical and Biological Weapons Control and Warfare Elimination Act of 1991"?
No.
Section 498A(b)(5): Has the President determined and certified to the appropriate congressional committees that the Government of Azerbaijan "is providing assistance for, or engaging in non-market-based trade (as defined in section 498B(k)(3)) with the Cuban Government? If so, has the President taken action to withhold assistance from Azerbaijan under the Foreign Assistance Act within 30 days of such a determination, or has Congress enacted legislation disapproving the determination within that 30-day period?"
No.
The President has not determined that the Government of Azerbaijan is providing assistance for, or engaging in any non-market-based trade with, the Cuban government.
CRITERIA FOR U.S. ASSISTANCE UNDER SECTION 498A(a) OF THE FOREIGN ASSISTANCE ACT OF 1961
BELARUS
Section 201 of the FREEDOM Support Act amended Section 498A of the Foreign Assistance Act of 1961 to provide that, "In providing assistance under (Chapter 11 of the FSA) for the government of any independent state of the former Soviet Union, the President take into account not only relative need but also the extent to which that independent state is acting to:"
Section 498A(a)(1): "make significant progress toward, and is committed to the comprehensive implementation of a democratic system based on principles of the rule of law, individual freedoms, and representative government determined by free and fair elections."
Belarus has an authoritarian regime in which nearly all power is concentrated in the hands of the President and a small circle of advisors.
After his election in July 1994 to a 5-year term as the countrys first president, Aleksandr Lukashenko consolidated power steadily in the executive branch.
He used a November 1996 referendum to amend the 1994 Constitution in order to broaden his powers and extend his term in office.
Lukashenko ignored the then Constitutional Courts ruling that the Constitution could not be amended by referendum.
As a result, the current political system is based on the 1996 Constitution, which was adopted in an unconstitutional manner.
Most members of the international community reject that flawed referendum and do not recognize the legitimacy of the 1996 Constitution, or the bicameral legislature that it introduced.
Parliamentary elections took place in October 2000, the first since the 1996 referendum.
The Organization for Security and Cooperation in Europe (OSCE)/Office of Democratic Institution and Human Rights (ODIHR) concluded that the elections fell short of international standards and were neither free nor fair.
Lukashenko renewed his term of office in Presidential elections held on September 9, 2001.
OSCE/ODIHR concluded that the election process failed to meet OSCE criteria for free, fair, transparent and accountable democratic elections.
OSCE/ODIHR singled out as serious problems: restrictions on campaigning and election observation, the opposition's lack of access to state media, government censorship of independent media, lack of independence of electoral commissions, and arbitrary changing of the electoral environment by the government.
Although the amended Constitution provides for a formal separation of powers, the President dominates all branches of Government.
The Constitution limits the legislature to meeting twice a year for no more than a total of 170 days.
Presidential decrees made when the legislature is out of session have the force of law, exceptin theoryin those cases restricted by the 1996 Constitution.
The 1996 Constitution also allows the President to issue decrees having the force of law in circumstances of specific necessity and urgency, a provision that Lukashenko has interpreted broadly.
The judiciary is not independent.
Section 498A(a)(2): "make significant progress in, and is committed to the comprehensive implementation of, economic reform based on market principles, private ownership, and integration into the world economy, including implementation of the legal and policy frameworks necessary for such reform (including protection of intellectual property and respect for contracts)."
Despite some limited improvement in the past two years, Belarus still has one of the most state-dominated economies in the former Soviet Union.
The private sector share of GDP is only some 20 percent.
Only Turkmenistan ranks lower in the EBRD transition rankings.
Both the banking and manufacturing sectors are still government-controlled.
Price liberalization is incomplete.
The government sets wages.
Although Belarus made some progress in achieving a convertible currency last year as part of a Staff-Monitored Program with the International Monetary Fund (IMF), the government failed to undertake the structural reforms that would have led to negotiations on a Stand-by Agreement.
Growth was about 4 percent in 2001, and inflation stood at about 60 percent.
The Government of Belarus does not maintain a policy of support for a market economy; indeed, it continues to harass the limited private business that is able to operate.
Private market vendors have been a particular target, especially those organized in the Belarusian Union of Entrepreneurs.
The privatization that exists has been limited to small enterprises and mostly benefited a small elite.
The World Bank has prepared a Country Assistance Strategy but will not implement it until the Belarusian Government has agreed to a TB/AIDS project submitted earlier.
The European Bank for Reconstruction and Development is not currently pursuing any new public sector projects in Belarus and a new Country Assistance Strategy for Belarus has not yet been approved.
Belarus has applied for WTO membership but has made little tangible progress toward meeting the requirements of WTO accession.
A 1993 trade agreement between Belarus and the United States provides reciprocal Normal Trade Relations (formerly MFN) benefits and contains intellectual property rights provisions.
Belarus is the recipient of a waiver -- that was extended for an additional 12 month period on June 3, 2002 -- under the Jackson-Vanik Amendment of the Trade Act of 1974, as amended.
A Bilateral Investment Treaty (BIT) was ratified by the Belarusian Parliament in October 1995 and received U.S. Senate approval in June 1996.
But as the political situation deteriorated in late 1996, the United States decided to delay indefinitely its entry into force pending improvement of the political and economic climate.
In 1997, the Overseas Private Investment Corporation (OPIC) paid its first claim in the NIS in Belarus.
OPIC has engaged unsuccessfully in efforts to obtain compensation from the Government of Belarus after paying U.S. company Alliant Techsystems, Inc. for the expropriation of its investment in the Belconvers joint venture.
OPICs programs in Belarus are suspended because of an adverse labor rights determination made by the U.S. Government.
EXIM and TDA activity in Belarus remain suspended due to the poor investment and political climate.
Section 498A(a)(3): "respect internationally recognized human rights, including the rights of minorities and the rights to freedom of religion and emigration."
The Belarusian governments human rights record further deteriorated in 2002.
Restrictions on freedoms of speech, press and peaceful assembly continued, and the government did not respect freedom of association.
There have been no meaningful developments in investigating the disappearances of prominent opposition figures Victor Gonchar, Anatoly Krasovsky, Yuriy Zakharenko, nor that of journalist Dmitry Zavadsky.
Chairman of the pre-1996 parliament Semyon Sharetsky, opposition figure Zianon Pazniak, and former national bank chairperson Tamara Vinnikova remain in exile out of fear for their safety.
Prolonged detention on political grounds and delays in trials are common.
Arrests or beatings are common responses to peaceful protests.
The security services infringe the privacy rights of citizens and closely monitor the activities of opposition politicians and other segments of the population.
Government security agents frequently harass human rights advocates.
Worker rights continue to be restricted by government authorities, who stepped up the harassment of independent trade unions during the 2001 presidential campaign and its aftermath.
According to official data, the state did not deny any citizens permission to emigrate in 2002.
Significant ethnic tensions do not appear to exist in Belarus.
The constitution provides for freedom of religion.
However, the government restricts this right in practice.
The government accords preferential treatment to the part of the Russian Orthodox Church loyal to the Moscow Patriarch, while harassing adherents of the Belarusian Autocephalous Orthodox Church (BOAC).
The authorities continued to refuse to register the BOAC, demolishing a church building while under construction in the summer of 2002.
On October 31, 2002, Lukashenko signed a new Religion Law which further confirms the Russian Orthodox Church's preferential status and disadvantages "non-traditional" religions.
The new law requires that all religious groups re-register, or risk engaging in outlawed religious activity.
Only registered religious organizations may publish materials and engage in education, but such organizations are restricted to those which consist of at least ten groups, one of which must have been present in Belarus for 20 years.
Unregistered groups will not be able to worship in public or own, lease, or occupy property.
The law also provides the Government with the implicit right to censor religious publications, bans foreign citizens from leading religious organizations, and bans all but occasional, small religious meetings in private homes.
Respect for the rights of minorities may erode with enforcement of the new law.
Pentecostals and some members of the Jewish community have complained of harassment and state-sponsored anti-Semitic publications and television programs, although societal anti-Semitism is not usually manifested openly.
Senior government officials and the state media have occasionally used coded anti-Semitism in attacking political opponents.
There is no legal basis for restitution of property that was seized during the Soviet and Nazi occupation.
Many former synagogues, churches and mosques in Belarus are used as theaters, museums, and sports complexes.
One former synagogue is now a German-owned beer hall.
The Jewish community's requests to have these synagogues returned have been refused.
Despite these difficulties, several local Jewish communities have successfully reclaimed synagogues and other properties.
Section 498A(a)(4): "respect international law and obligations and adhere to the Helsinki Final Act of the Conference on Security and Cooperation in Europe and the Charter of Paris, including the obligations to refrain from the threat or use of force and to settle disputes peacefully."
As a result of the Belarusian government's failure to adhere to its human rights commitments under the Helsinki Final Act, the OSCE undertook to establish an Advisory and Monitoring Group (AMG) in Minsk to assist the government in fulfilling these commitments.
After much resistance, the government of Belarus permitted the AMG to open in February 1998 with a mandate to monitor the human rights situation and advise the government.
The Lukashenko regime subsequently succeeded in forcing the AMG's closure in country by refusing to issue visas, renew visas, or extend diplomatic accreditation.
The last professional staff member left Belarus on October 29, 2002.
Fourteen member countries of the European Union reacted to the forced AMG closure by exercising their rights under the Schengen Treaty to not allow Lukashenko and seven high-ranking officials to travel to or through their territories.
The United States announced on November 26, 2002 that it would institute a ban on travel to the U.S. for the same officials.
In June 1998, the Belarusian authorities violated the principle of inviolability of diplomatic missions under the Vienna Convention on Diplomatic Relations by evicting the U.S. and other countries' ambassadors from their diplomatic residences, terminating all access to the properties and declaring the area a "presidential territory."
The United States, the European Union and other countries recalled their ambassadors, sent their Belarusian counterparts home and took other measures in protest.
In September 1999 this dispute was resolved, the Government of Belarus paid compensation for taking the U.S. residence, and the U.S. ambassador returned to Minsk.
In November 1999, Belarus joined the other OSCE states in signing the Charter for European Security that reaffirms full adherence to all OSCE documents already in force.
The Belarusian government's military doctrine is in accord with the OSCE principles on the inviolability of borders and non-interference in the internal affairs of other states.
Belarus rejects war as a means of settling disputes.
Its constitution declares Belarus a non-nuclear and neutral state.
Section 498A(a)(5): "cooperate in seeking peaceful resolution of ethnic and regional conflicts."
Belarusian leader Lukashenko was an outspoken supporter of Serbian ethnic cleansing in Kosovo.
As a result of this, Belarus broke relations with NATO during the bombing campaign against Serbia.
Lukashenko also supports Russia's military actions in Chechnya.
Other than this, Belarus is not involved directly in ethnic or regional conflicts and has supported the Commonwealth of Independent States and OSCE as conflict-resolving mechanisms.
Belarus is only a conditional member of the CIS Collective Security Agreement; its constitution prohibits the stationing of foreign troops in Belarus and the deployment of Belarusian troops abroad.
Section 498A(a)(6): "implement responsible security policies, including--
(A) adhering to arms control obligations derived from agreements signed by the former Soviet Union;
(B) reducing military forces and expenditures to a level consistent with legitimate defense requirements;
(C) not proliferating nuclear, biological, or chemical weapons, their delivery systems, or related technologies; and
(D) restraining conventional weapons transfers."
In late 1997, after Belarus failed to utilize Cooperative Threat Reduction Act (CTR) assistance for destruction of its SS-25 launch pads, that assistance project was terminated.
The launch sites will remain START-accountable until they are destroyed although Belarus does not possess any SS-25 missiles.
Other CTR assistance was suspended in 1997 because of concerns about Belarus commitment to observing human rights.
President Lukashenko has publicly expressed regret over the removal of nuclear weapons from Belarus.
Belarus has reduced the size of its armed forces and related expenditures.
Belarus has stated its intention to convert its defense industry to civilian production but lacks the funds to do so quickly.
The Belarusian authorities have also made declarations of their intent to form a single military district with Russia, which at one point they claimed would contain 300,000 soldiers.
Belarus is a State Party to the 1993 Convention on the Prohibition of the Development, Production, Stockpiling and Use of Chemical Weapons and on Their Destruction, and to the 1972 Convention on the Prohibition of the Development, Production and Stockpiling of Bacteriological (Biological) and Toxin Weapons and on Their Destruction and, with two exceptions, has submitted voluntary annual BWC-related CBM Data Declarations regularly since 1991.
Belarus ratified the comprehensive Nuclear Test Ban Treaty (CTBT) in September 2000.
We are not aware that Belarus has engaged in the proliferation of nuclear, biological, or chemical weapons or related technology.
We continue to enlist the cooperation of the GOB to investigate reports and stop sales of dual-use items for potential use in programs of concern.
Belarus became a member of the Nuclear Suppliers Group on May 19, 2000 and as such adheres to adopted current international export standards on nuclear and nuclear-related items, including the NSG commitment to require full scope safeguards as a condition of nuclear supply.
We have blocked Belarus membership in the NPT Exporters Committee (Zangger Committee) because of human rights concerns.
Belarus is a party to the START and INF Treaties and is an active participant in the Joint Compliance and Inspection Commission and the Special Verification Commission of the START and INF Treaties, respectively.
Belarus is a party to the CFE Treaty, participates in the Treatys implementation forum, the CFE Joint Consultative Group, and signed both the CFE Flank Agreement in 1996 (ratified in 1997) and the adapted CFE Treaty in 1999.
Belarus ratified the adapted CFE Treaty in 2001.
Although there have been some continuing concerns about Belarus compliance with individual CFE provisions, generally speaking Belarus has fulfilled its obligations under this Treaty.
Belarus has submitted Confidence- and Security-Building Measures (CSBM) annual data declarations for 1991-2001 and has willingly undergone CSBM inspections and evaluation visits in accordance with the OSCE Vienna Document.
In 2002, Belarus continued to be a leading conventional arms exporter as it sold off excess Soviet-era equipment.
Moreover, an increasing number of reports of Belarusian transfers or potential transfers of conventional weapons to state-sponsors of terrorism have been received, especially to Iraq.
There are also reports of arms retransfers from Belarus to countries of concern (armaments originating in Russia and other former Soviet states).
In addition, credible allegations that the Belarusian government was offering training in advanced anti-aircraft systems (S-200 and S-300) to Iraqi military personnel surfaced in October 2001.
The U.S. Government continues to monitor Belarus' relationship with Iraq and other nations of concern closely.
By a presidential decree on December 4, 1997, Belarus formalized its Moratorium on the Export of Anti-Personnel Landmines, which it had observed in practice since August 1995.
Belarus was one of the original Subscribing States to the International Code of Conduct Against Ballistic Missile Proliferation (ICOC) that officially entered into effect on November 25, 2002.
Belarus acceded to the NPT in 1993 as a non-nuclear weapons state.
Section 498A(a)(7): "take constructive actions to protect the international environment, prevent significant transborder pollution, and promote sustainable use of natural resources."
Belarus has taken positive steps to address international environmental concerns by establishing ministries of energy, forestry and water resources, and land reclamation.
It has also established state committees on the consequences of the Chornobyl accident, the ecology, and the supervision of safety procedures in industry and the nuclear power industry.
Belarus suffered considerably from the effects of the Chornobyl disaster and has actively sought U.S. assistance in cleaning up areas contaminated by radiation.
Air and water pollution problems of varying degrees of seriousness plague Belarus.
Rivers are considered "moderately polluted" from industrial and agricultural sources.
Some land reclamation efforts, undertaken in the name of economic development, have contributed to severe ecological problems in the Polesye region.
Belarus has set up a Committee of the Council of Ministers on Emergency Situations, on the Consequences of the Chornobyl Disaster, and the Environment to oversee and coordinate environmental protection efforts undertaken by individual ministries.
Several non-governmental organizations (NGOs) and foundations continue to deal with the Chornobyl aftermath.
The authorities have harassed and closed many of the programs of these NGOs.
Belarus possesses the human and natural resources to gradually address the environmental challenges facing the country.
Sufficient political will and a willingness to take the steps necessary to facilitate international funding would help to sustain progress in environmental restoration and protection.
Section 498A(a)(8): "deny support for acts of international terrorism."
There is no compelling evidence that Belarus has granted sanctuary from prosecution to individuals or groups that have committed acts of international terrorism or otherwise support international terrorism, although there are unconfirmed reports that Belarus may have aided terrorists from the Caucasus region in the past.
Belarus has signed all twelve international counter-terrorism conventions and is party to nine of them.
Section 498A(a)(9): "accept responsibility for paying an equitable portion of the indebtedness to United States firms incurred by the former Soviet Union."
In October 1991, shortly before the Soviet Union dissolved, Russia and nine other Soviet republics, including Belarus, signed a Memorandum of Understanding declaring that they were jointly and severally liable for the pre-October 1991 debt to foreign creditors of the Soviet Union.
In December 1991, Russia and seven other republics, including Belarus, signed an agreement which assigned to each of the newly independent states a share of all the external assets and foreign debt of the former Soviet Union (FSU).
The December 1991 agreement provided that Belarus' share of the debt of the former Soviet Union would be 4.13 percent.
In 1992, Russia sought to replace the "joint and several liability" principle by seeking full liability for the foreign debt of the FSU in return for all the external assets of the FSU.
In July 1992, Belarus signed a "double-zero option" agreement with Russia under which Russia agreed to pay Belarus' share of the foreign debt of the FSU in return for Belarus' share of the external assets of the FSU.
Please see section 498A(a)(9) of the Russia FSA report regarding indebtedness to the United States incurred by the former Soviet Union.
Section 498A(a)(10): "cooperate with the United States Government in uncovering all evidence regarding Americans listed as prisoners-of-war, or otherwise missing during American operations, who were detained in the former Soviet Union during the Cold War."
The U.S. effort to uncover evidence of American POWs and MIAs in Belarus is conducted through the U.S.-Russian Joint Commission on POWs/MIAs established in March 1992.
Beginning in 1997, however, U.S. officials held several meetings directly with Belarusian officials toward establishing a bilateral agreement.
Meetings have continued, although due to the poor state of relations conclusion of an agreement has been delayed.
Section 498A(a)(11): 'terminate support for the communist regime in Cuba, including removal of troops, closing of military and intelligence facilities, including the military and intelligence facilities at Lourdes and Cienfuegos, and ceasing trade subsidies and economic, nuclear, and other assistance.
We have no evidence from which to conclude that the Government of Belarus is currently providing military, intelligence, economic, nuclear, or other assistance to the Government of Cuba.
Given all information at hand, all trade is believed to occur on market terms.
CHECKLIST FOR GROUNDS OF INELIGIBILITY UNDER SECTION 498A(b) OF THE FOREIGN ASSISTANCE ACT OF 1961
BELARUS
Section 498A(b)(1): Has the President determined that the Government of Belarus has "engaged in a consistent pattern of gross violations of internationally recognized human rights or of international law?" No.
The President has not made such a determination at this time.
However, as discussed above, we continue to have serious and increasing concerns about the Lukashenko regime's human rights record.
Section 498A(b)(2): Has the President determined that the Government of Belarus "has failed to take constructive actions to facilitate the effective implementation of applicable arms control obligations derived from agreements signed by the former Soviet Union?" No.
We do not believe that the Government of Belarus has failed to take such actions.
However, we are very concerned about the Belarusian government's decision not to destroy the SS-25 launch pads, despite offers of USG assistance.
Even though the Start I final implementation deadline of December 5, 2001, has passed, we continue to press the Belarusian government to destroy the launch pads.
Section 498A(b)(3): Has the President determined that, after October 24, 1992, the Government of Belarus knowingly transferred to another country:
(A) missiles or missile technology inconsistent with the guidelines and parameters of the Missile Technology Control Regime; or
(B) any material, equipment, or technology that would contribute significantly to the ability of such country to manufacture any weapon of mass destruction (including nuclear, chemical, and biological weapons) if the President determined that the material, equipment, or technology was to be used by such country in the manufacture of such weapon?"
No such determinations have been made.
Section 498A(b)(4): Is the Government of Belarus "prohibited from receiving such assistance by section 101 or 102 of the Arms Export Control Act or sections 306(a)(1) and 307 of the Chemical and Biological Weapons Control and Warfare Elimination Act of 1991?"
No.
Section 498A(b)(5): Has the President determined and certified within 30 days to the appropriate congressional committees that the Government of Belarus "is providing assistance for, or engaging in, non-market-based trade (as defined in section 498B(k)(3)) with the Cuban government?" If so, has the President taken action to withhold assistance from the Government of Belarus under the Foreign Assistance Act within 30 days of such a determination, or has Congress enacted legislation disapproving the determination within that 30-day period?"
No.
The President has not determined that the Government of Belarus is providing assistance for, or engaging in any non-market-based trade with, the Cuban government.
CRITERIA FOR U.S. ASSISTANCE UNDER SECTION 498A(a) OF THE FOREIGN ASSISTANCE ACT OF 1961
GEORGIA
Section 201 of the FREEDOM Support Act amended Section 498A of the Foreign Assistance Act of 1961 to require that the President "take into account not only relative need but also the extent to which that independent state is acting to:
Section 498A(a)(1): "make significant progress toward, and is committed to the comprehensive implementation of a democratic system based on principles of the rule of law, individual freedoms, and representative government determined by free and fair elections."
Since 1991 Georgia has made uneven progress toward the implementation of a democratic system based on principles of the rule of law, individual freedoms, and representative government determined by free and fair elections.
The Georgian parliament adopted a new constitution in August 1995.
Presidential and parliamentary elections were held for the first time under the new constitution on November 5, 1995.
Local elections were held for the first time in November 1998, although the central government continues to appoint key local officials.
Parliamentary elections were held for the second time on October 31, 1999; the OSCE stated that the election constituted a step toward compliance with OSCE commitments.
However, in a presidential election held on April 9, 2000, the OSCE and other international observers determined that the elections were marred by several serious irregularities, and therefore did not meet international standards.
Problems included interference by state authorities in the election process; deficient election legislation; not fully representative election administration; and unreliable voter registers.
Local elections scheduled for fall 2001 were postponed until 2002.
Parliamentary by-elections held October 21, 2001 in two districts were considered an improvement by international observers.
Local elections in June 2002 were marred by irregularities.
Parliamentary by-elections on November 30, 2002 failed in 2 of 4 districts due to low voter turnout.
Parliament passed significant legislation instituting legal, institutional and procedural reforms supportive of rule of law, individual freedoms and representative government.
However, Parliament amended the Criminal Procedures Code in 1999, and several amendments substantially weakened protections against arbitrary arrest and detention.
Law enforcement agencies have made little progress in adapting their practices to democratic norms.
Although the 1995 Constitution provides for an independent judiciary, the judiciary is subject to executive pressure.
Section 498A(a)(2): "make significant progress in, and is committed to the comprehensive implementation of, economic reform based on market principles, private ownership, and integration into the world economy, including implementation of the legal and policy frameworks necessary for such reform (including protection of intellectual property and respect for contracts)."
Economic growth is slow, hampered by a poor harvest in 2002 and ongoing poor economic management.
In 2002, Georgia continued to make progress in the area of revenue collection, although shortfalls persist.
Sequestration of the budget is expected, after the Autonomous Republic of Ajara failed to remit revenues, and disbursements from the EU were delayed as a result of the kidnapping of an EU advisor.
Georgia is applying for an extension of debt rescheduling terms with Paris Club creditors, in order to continue cash flow relief for the government.
The national bank has allowed the national currency, the lari, to float since 1998.
The currency depreciated steeply at that time, but remained relatively stable through 2002.
Inflation remains stable.
The national bank continues to improve banking supervision and to meet International Monetary Fund (IMF) targets on reserves.
Banking consolidation continues as well, and amendments to the law on the National Bank of Georgia were passed.
Georgia began to privatize its energy distribution system in 1998: the Telasi electricity distribution company was privatized in January 1999, and the thermal power plant at Gardabani was privatized in January 2000.
The Wholesale Energy Market privatization was completed in 2001.
Parliament passed legislation on the privatization of the state telecommunications monopoly in 2000, but when the tender closed in November 2000, there were no bidders.
Small-scale privatization is virtually complete and 76 percent of medium- and large-scale enterprises have been privatized.
With U.S. assistance, a land-titling program helped to implement low-cost, transparent titling and registration processes for approximately 1.5 million agricultural parcels out of a total of 2.4 million parcels surveyed and identified.
Georgia is a member of the International Monetary Fund, World Bank and European Bank for Reconstruction and Development.
Georgia acceded to the World Trade Organization (WTO) on June 14, 2000.
Georgia has enacted some legislation on protection of intellectual property rights (IPR), but there are still shortcomings and further steps need to be taken to meet all of Georgia's international IPR obligations.
Enforcement of intellectual property regulations is weak due to lack of resources and expertise.
A bilateral investment treaty entered into force in August 1997.
On November 9, 2000, Congress authorized the President to determine that the provisions of Title IV of the 1974 Trade Act (which includes the Jackson-Vanik Amendment) should no longer apply to Georgia.
Pursuant to this authorization, on December 29, 2000, the President extended normal trade relations to Georgia.
However, foreign direct investment is not increasing, due largely to a non-transparent business environment.
An Overseas Private Investment Corporation agreement has been in force since 1992, and in 2001 Georgia received designation from the United States Trade Representative as a beneficiary under the Generalized System of Preferences (GSP).
Section 498A(a)(3): "respect internationally recognized human rights, including the rights of minorities and the rights to freedom of religion and emigration."
The constitution incorporates human rights protections, however, the government's human rights record remains poor.
In 1995, the constitutionally mandated office of the Public Defender, or ombudsman was created.
The National Security Council's human rights advisor, which has a mandate to investigate claims of abuse, as well as the Public Defender were active in several individual cases involving police misconduct.
While government representatives have been effective in specific cases, neither they nor NGOs have been successful in prompting systemic reform.
The 1995 Constitution provides for an independent judiciary, delineates the authorities of individual courts, and sets forth principles to safeguard citizens rights.
Significant problems remain, however, because the judiciary has not yet developed sufficiently to carry out the responsibilities set forth in the Constitution and does not exercise much independence from the executive branch.
Judicial corruption and denial of fair and expeditious trials continue.
A judicial reform law resulted in the removal of many corrupt and incompetent judges.
They were replaced with judges who had passed a qualifying exam and vetting process.
However, failure to pay judges in a timely manner has undermined reform efforts.
Prolonged pre-trial detention is a problem.
Impunity and corruption in law enforcement are widespread.
Torture is illegal; however, detainees continue to be beaten and tortured, usually to extract money or confessions.
In 2001 the Ministry of Justice instituted some reforms after taking over responsibility for the prison system from the Ministry of Internal Affairs.
The Justice Minister attempted to address overcrowding in the country's prisons by accelerating the construction of a new prison near Tbilisi.
While the new prison will help to alleviate overcrowding, conditions in other facilities have not significantly improved.
The Justice Minister also fired some corrupt administrators, released inmates to reduce overcrowding, and took steps toward creating a prison inspection system that would include NGO participation.
However, the Justice Minister resigned in September 2001 and in October 2001 was elected to Parliament.
The ICRC had full access to detention facilities, including those in Abkhazia, and access included private meetings with detainees and regular visits.
However, local human rights groups reported increasing difficulty in visiting detainees, especially in cases with political overtones.
International and local human rights groups agree that there are several political prisoners, but disagree on the number.
Freedom to travel and emigrate is generally respected, as is freedom of the press, although independent media have on occasion been subject to harassment and intimidation by government officials.
Georgi Sanaia, a local journalist, and host of a nightly political talk show on the independent Rustavi-2 television station was murdered under suspicious circumstances in July 2001.
In 2002, the status of religious freedom continued to deteriorate, attacks by orthodox extremists against religious minorities increased in frequency, and these acts of violence occurred with impunity during the period covered by this report.
Police and other officials at times have harassed members of some religious groups and foreign missionaries.
Police have remained passive when faced with - and at times even participated in - a growing number of violent attacks on religious minorities, particularly Jehovah's Witnesses.
Assembly of God, Baptists, Pentecostals, evangelicals, and Hare Krishnas have also experienced difficulties.
Parliament passed a resolution condemning religious violence and some investigations have been opened to look into the attacks.
However, the Ministry of Interior (including the police) and Procuracy generally have failed to pursue criminal cases against extremists for their attacks against religious minorities.
In March 2002, Father Basili Mkalavishvili, an excommunicated Orthodox priest who has incited a number of violent attacks on religious minorities, was brought to court, but was acquitted that same month.
After a brief period of relative calm, attacks by Mkalavishvili and others resumed.
In 2002, the Basilists also turned their attacks against television stations broadcasting non-Orthodox religious programming, as well as against the Liberty Institute which advocates on behalf of religious freedom.
After many months of delay, the trial against Basili Mkalavishvili and several of his supporters resumed in November 2002.
The trial is currently being conducted with continuing delays, which both sides seem to feel are justified.
Security in the courtroom, however, has been an issue, as a reporter for RFE/RL was forced to leave by an angry mob during the recess and one of the defendants was armed and chastised by the bench.
Section 498A(a)(4): "respect international law and obligations and adhere to the Helsinki Final Act of the Conference on Security and Cooperation in Europe and the Charter of Paris, including the obligations to refrain from the threat or use of force and to settle disputes peacefully."
While progress has been made toward the observance of international legal obligations and OSCE commitments in the area of human rights, the status of Abkhazia and South Ossetia, two separatist regions within Georgian territory, remain unresolved.
The United States continues to work bilaterally and with the UN, the OSCE and other nations to encourage all parties to pursue a peaceful resolution of both conflicts in a manner that safeguards both the territorial integrity of Georgia and the rights of individuals belonging to ethnic minorities.
In November 1999, Georgia joined the other OSCE states in signing the Charter for European Security, which reaffirms full adherence to all OSCE documents already in force.
Section 498A(a)(5): "cooperate in seeking peaceful resolution of ethnic and regional conflicts."
President Shevardnadze has consistently stressed Georgia's commitment to negotiate a peaceful settlement to the conflict in Abkhazia.
He has pledged to continue this approach despite Abkhazia's unilateral declaration of independence in November 1994, its adoption of a constitution, its holding of presidential elections in October 1999 and 2001, and its demand that any settlement grant the region equal status with the government in Tbilisi.
Negotiations under the auspices of the UN remain ongoing.
Special Representative of the UN Secretary General (SRSG) Heidi Tagliavini continued to press for adoption of a UN draft proposal on the distribution of constitutional competencies between Georgia and Abkhazia.
Since 1992, an OSCE mission has been working in Georgia to facilitate a political settlement of the South Ossetia dispute.
The Georgian government has fully supported the mandate of the OSCE mission, which includes developing democratic institutions and encouraging respect for human rights throughout Georgia.
The Georgian government and representatives of the Abkhaz separatist regime have cooperated with the UN and OSCE, which established a human rights office in Sukhumi, the capital of Abkhazia's separatist regime.
The office monitors the human rights situation in the region and encourages practices consistent with international human rights standards.
Section 498A(a)(6): "implement responsible security policies, including --
(A) adhering to arms control obligations derived from agreements signed by the former Soviet Union;
(B) reducing military forces and expenditures to a level consistent with legitimate defense requirements;
(C) nonproliferation of nuclear, biological, or chemical weapons, their delivery systems, or related technologies; and
(D) restraining conventional weapons transfers."
Georgia has acknowledged it is a successor to the former Soviet Unions obligations under the INF Treaty.
Although it does not actively participate in the Treatys Special Verification Commission, Georgia continues to observe the Treatys obligations.
Georgia ratified the CFE Treaty in 1992 and the 1996 Flank Agreement in 1997.
Thereafter, Georgia participated actively in negotiations to adapt the CFE Treaty, which culminated at the November 1999 OSCE Summit in Istanbul with signature by all 30 CFE states of an agreement on CFE adaptation.
The Government of Georgia has consistently made clear its commitment to achieving full implementation of the CFE Treaty.
Georgia is in full compliance under CFE and has accepted CFE inspections of forces on its territory.
At the Istanbul Summit, Russia and Georgia agreed to a series of steps that were subsequently incorporated into the Final Act of the Conventional Forces in Europe (CFE) Treaty.
In the Joint Statement of the Russian Federation and Georgia (Annex 14 of the Final Act), Russia agreed to reduce by no later than December 31, 2000 its Treaty-Limited Equipment (TLE) located within the territory of Georgia so as not to exceed 153 tanks, 241 ACVs and 140 artillery systems.
Russia met this obligation on time.
Russia also agreed to disband two of its bases in Georgia (Gudauta in separatist Abkhazia, and Vaziani near Tbilisi) by July 1, 2001.
The Vaziani base withdrawal was completed according to the schedule, and equipment was removed from Gudauta in October 2001.
However, Russia did not fulfill CFE transparency requirements during withdrawal from Gudauta, nor has it legally transferred the base to the Georgian side.
The two sides have not yet agreed on the status of Gudauta as a CIS PKF facility.
Additionally, Georgia and Russia have not yet reached agreement on the duration of the remaining Russian presence at bases at Batumi and Akhalkalaki.
Following the OSCEs Porto Ministerial in December, Russia and Georgia resumed discussions of withdrawal issues at the expert level.
The United States has offered to assist with the withdrawal of Russian forces from Georgia via financial contributions to the OSCEs Voluntary Fund for Georgia and reimbursement of costs associated with the implementation of the Russian withdrawal.
While substantial funds were committed in 2000 to support the costs of observing the Russian withdrawal of TLE equipment and to reimburse Georgia's implementation costs, Russia's TLE withdrawal costs have not yet been reimbursed because the Russian Federation has not yet provided the documentation of costs needed to complete the reimbursement.
Other countries have also offered to support aspects of the withdrawal and base closure process through the OSCE Voluntary Fund.
Russia has signaled that it may seek assistance with the costs of closing the remaining two bases.
Georgia has submitted Confidence- and Security-Building Measures (CSBM) annual data declarations for years1996 to present and has willingly undergone CSBM inspections and evaluation visits in accordance with the OSCE Vienna Document.
Georgia subscribed to the International Code of Conduct Against Ballistic Missile Proliferation in November 2002.
The United States is helping to enhance Georgia's security through the U.S.-Georgian Border Security and Law Enforcement (Border Guards) Program, Foreign Military Financing (FMF), International Military Education and Training (IMET), and Excess Defense Article (EDA) programs.
Other countries have also provided some military assistance, but the Georgian military remains ill-equipped.
The $64 million Georgia Train and Equip Program seeks to accomplish our broader goals of military reform, while enhancing Georgia's capability to secure control of its territory and combat terrorism.
We are not aware that Georgia has engaged in the proliferation of any nuclear, biological, or chemical weapons, their delivery systems, or related technology.
Georgia acceded to the Nuclear Non-Proliferation Treaty as a non-nuclear-weapons state on March 7, 1994.
Georgia signed its NPT safeguards agreement with the International Atomic Energy Agency on September 29, but this has not yet entered into force.
Georgia is a state party to both the multilateral Chemical Weapons Convention and the Biological Weapons Convention, which call for the elimination of chemical, bacteriological and toxin weapons and prohibit their development, production, and stockpiling.
Georgia provided its annual voluntary BWC-related CBM Data Declaration only once in 2000.
We do not believe that Georgia has engaged in significant transfers of conventional weapons.
In addition to contacts with other western governments, Georgia has closely engaged with the United States on cooperative efforts to establish an effective export control system and works with the United States closely under the Cooperative Threat Reduction program.
In 1999 Georgia adopted a new law on export controls and recently reorganized its export control structure, placing the Ministry of Economics and Trade as the lead agency.
The only control list in use is that of the CIS, but Georgia committed during the 1999 Caucasus and Central Asia Regional export Control Forum to adopt the EU List.
The Government of Georgia hosted the 1999 conference, and export controllers used the attention it attracted to strengthen its export control system internally.
Section 498A(a)(7): "take constructive actions to protect the international environment, prevent significant transborder pollution, and promote sustainable use of natural resources."
Georgia faces an array of environmental problems ranging from air and water pollution to deterioration of soils as a result of inefficient agricultural practices.
Deforestation and the illegal export of timber remain serious problems.
The government of Georgia has taken some steps to put in place public policy mechanisms to address environmental issues, including the establishment of a ministry of environment.
National environmental NGOs continue to gain access to the policy-making process on environmental issues.
Georgian interest in regional cooperation on environmental issues also continues, but effective coordination and information sharing on transborder issues is progressing slowly.
The Georgian government is committed to meeting its requirements in environmental monitoring and evaluation capabilities as outlined in the Host Government Agreements for the Baku-Tbilisi-Ceyhan oil pipeline and the Shah Deniz gas pipeline.
Evidence of the priority placed on the environment is exhibited by the resolution in November 2002 of concerns expressed by the Georgian government and environmental NGOs over the environmental impact of the chosen pipeline route for BTC.
The Regional Environmental Center (REC) located in Tbilisi, which was established in 2000 with the cooperation of the United States, is focused on implementing its needs assessment plan from 2001.
The United States and the European Union are supporting and co-financing the establishment of this independent, non-profit and non-political organization, the mission of which is to strengthen civil society and support sustainable development by promoting public awareness and participation in regional environmental decision-making.
The World Bank has also undertaken a program, administered in cooperation with the National Park Service of the U.S. Department of the Interior, to help Georgia protect habitats, promote biological diversity and environmental protection, and develop management of park and natural areas.
The Government of Georgia in 2002 issued a decree aimed at protecting the water systems in the National Parks.
The World Bank is also focused on rehabilitation of the irrigation systems in Western Georgia.
Section 498A(a)(8): "deny support for acts of international terrorism."
The Government of Georgia does not officially grant sanctuary from prosecution to individuals or groups that have committed acts of international terrorism or otherwise support international terrorism.
Beginning in autumn 1999, Russia has charged Georgia with allowing Islamic fundamentalists providing support to the Chechen insurgents to use Georgia as a staging area and transit point for fighters and materiel.
Georgia has made efforts to close its border with Chechnya to fighters and those who wish to smuggle money, weapons and supplies to them, but has been hindered by lack of resources and internal corruption.
In 2002, Georgian internal troops carried out operations to rid the Pankisi Gorge of terrorists.
The U.S. provided USD 17.3 million in FY 2002 to enhance Georgia's ability to control its borders.
Georgia is a party to six of the twelve international terrorism conventions; the remaining six are being considered in Parliament.
Section 498A(a)(9): "accept responsibility for paying an equitable portion of the indebtedness to United States firms incurred by the former Soviet Union."
In October 1991, shortly before the Soviet Union dissolved, Russia and nine other Soviet republics signed a Memorandum of Understanding declaring themselves jointly and severally liable for the pre-October 1991 debt to foreign creditors of the Soviet Union.
In December 1991, Russia and seven other republics signed an agreement that assigned to each of the newly independent states a share of all the external assets and foreign debt of the former Soviet Union (FSU).
Georgia signed both the October and December 1991 agreements.
The December 1991 agreement provided that Georgia's share of the FSU debt would be 1.62 percent.
In 1992, Russia sought to replace the joint and several liability principles by seeking full liability for the debt in return for all the external assets.
On September 14, 1993, Georgia signed a double-zero option agreement with Russia transferring Georgia's share of the FSU debt to Russia in exchange for its share of FSU assets.
The Georgian Parliament ratified the "zero option" agreement in March 2001, thereby entering it into force.
Please see section 498A(a)(9) of the Russia FSA report regarding indebtedness to the United States incurred by the former Soviet Union.
Section 498A(a)(10): "cooperate with the United States Government in uncovering all evidence regarding Americans listed as prisoners-of-war, or otherwise missing during American operations, who were detained in the former Soviet Union during the Cold War."
The U.S. effort to uncover evidence of American POWs and MIAs in the former Soviet Union is being conducted through the U.S.-Russian Joint Commission on POWs/MIAs that was established in March 1992.
The Commission visited Georgia in May 1996 and met with President Shevardnadze and other high level officials who promised cooperation.
Section 498A(a)(11): "terminate support for the communist regime in Cuba, including removal of troops, closing of military and intelligence facilities, including the military and intelligence facilities at Lourdes and Cienfuegos, and ceasing trade subsidies and economic, nuclear, and other assistance."
We have no evidence from which to conclude that the Government of Georgia is providing military and intelligence, economic, nuclear, or other assistance to the Government of Cuba.
CHECKLIST FOR GROUNDS OF INELIGIBILITY UNDER SECTION 498A(b) OF THE FOREIGN ASSISTANCE ACT OF 1961
GEORGIA
Section 498A(b)(1): Has the President determined that the Government of Georgia has "engaged in a consistent pattern of gross violations of internationally recognized human rights or of international law"?
No such pattern exists.
However, there are continuing serious shortcomings in a number of areas.
We remain committed to addressing these problems not only through diplomatic efforts but also through assistance programs.
Section 498A(b)(2): Has the President determined that the Government of Georgia "has failed to take constructive actions to facilitate the effective implementation of applicable arms control obligations derived from agreements signed by the former Soviet Union"?
No.
While there were minor flaws in its implementation record in the first years after independence, Georgia has been a constructive and responsible participant in arms control undertakings.
Section 498A(b)(3): Has the President determined that, after October 24, 1992, the Government of Georgia "knowingly transferred to another country --
(A) missiles or missile technology inconsistent with the guidelines and parameters of the Missile Technology Control Regime; or
(B) any material, equipment, or technology that would contribute significantly to the ability of such country to manufacture any weapon of mass destruction (including nuclear, chemical, and biological weapons) if the President determine[d] that the material, equipment, or technology was to be used by such country in the manufacture of such weapon"?
No such determinations have been made during the reporting period.
Section 498A(b)(4): Is the Government of Georgia "prohibited from receiving such assistance by section 101 or 102 of the Arms Export Control Act or sections 306(a)(1) and 307 of the Chemical and Biological Weapons Control and Warfare Elimination Act of 1991"?
No.
Section 498A(b)(5): Has the President determined and certified to the appropriate congressional committees that the Government of Georgia "is providing assistance for, or engaging in non-market-based trade (as defined in section 498B(k)(3)) with the Cuban government? If so, has the President taken action to withhold assistance from Georgia under the Foreign Assistance Act within 30 days of such a determination, or has Congress enacted legislation disapproving the determination within that 30-day period?"
No.
The President has not determined that the Government of Georgia is providing assistance for, or engaging in non-market-based trade with, the Cuban government.
CRITERIA FOR U.S. ASSISTANCE UNDER SECTION 498A(a) OF THE FOREIGN ASSISTANCE ACT OF 1961
KAZAKHSTAN
Section 201 of the FREEDOM Support Act amended Section 498A of the Foreign Assistance Act of 1961 to require that the President "take into account not only relative need but also the extent to which that independent state is acting to":
Section 498A(a)(1): "make significant progress toward, and is committed to the comprehensive implementation of, a democratic system based on principles of the rule of law, individual freedoms, and representative government determined by free and fair elections."
Kazakhstan has expressed a commitment to the protection of human rights, democracy and the rule of law.
However, the Constitution concentrates power in the presidency, granting the President considerable control over the legislature, judiciary, and local government.
President Nursultan Nazarbayev has been his nation's only leader since the break-up of the Soviet Union.
He was elected to a new seven-year term in a 1999 election.
He extended his previous term in office via a deeply flawed 1995 referendum without a contested presidential election (which, according to the Constitution then in force, should have been held in 1996).
A law passed in 2000 allows President Nazarbayev, as the countrys first President, to maintain certain policy prerogatives and a seat on the Security Council after he leaves office.
The 1999 Presidential election was held nearly two years earlier than previously scheduled.
The government used a restrictive electoral law to limit the field of serious candidates, based on convictions for political offenses.
Candidates received unequal access to the media, and there were numerous instances of intimidation of voters and the opposition prior to the election.
The Organization on Security and Cooperation in Europe (OSCE) determined that the process in this referendum fell far short of its standards for open, free, and fair elections.
Although an improvement in many ways over the 1999 presidential election, the 1999 Parliamentary elections were marred by election law deficiencies, executive branch interference in the electoral process, and a lack of government openness about vote tabulations.
There was convincing evidence of government manipulation of results in some cases.
The OSCE mission sent to observe the elections concluded that the elections were "a tentative step toward democracy" but "fell short of (Kazakhstan's) OSCE commitments."
In 2000, the GOK and OSCE Office for Democratic Institutions and Human Rights (ODIHR) agreed to launch a series of broadly inclusive roundtables to review OSCE recommendations for electoral reform.
In 2001, three political opposition parties (Azamat, People's National Congress, and Republican National People's Party) withdrew from the process citing the government as unresponsive to their suggestions.
The roundtable process concluded in January 2002 and a report delivered to the Government and Parliament.
Unfortunately, the OSCEs final report was a catalogue of diverse and often conflicting suggestions to current electoral law.
Local NGOs were also given the opportunity to submit electoral reform recommendations.
By the end of 2002, however, the Government had yet to produce a new Election Law draft.
Nevertheless, the absence of new legislation gave the Central Election Commission latitude to revise its own technical instructions, and it had made a number of improvements to them after the 1999 elections.
They will be put to the test in a December 2002 special election for three vacant parliamentary seats.
Experimental local district akim (mayor) elections were held in October 2001.
In each oblast, elections were held to fill akim positions.
Candidates were chosen by the Oblast Administration.
The local akims were elected by secret ballots cast by a group of electors, who were chosen by a public show of hands vote.
The OSCE noted that these legal provisions represented a first step toward local self-determination.
While this represented a first tentative movement away from appointment of local District Akims, President Nazarbayev, in statements throughout 2002, appeared to not support the continuation of the experiment.
It remains to be seen whether the local level elections will be repeated in the near future, as many opposition political movements have publicly advocated.
In Kazakhstan, the executive branch dominates political institutions and the Parliament.
The President has the power to appoint local governors and the cabinet.
Currently, the Parliament cannot initiate changes to the Constitution or allocate funds without the approval of the executive branch.
It has, with minor exceptions, toed the Executive's line.
However, Members of Parliament (MPs) have the right to introduce legislation, and some bills introduced by MPs have become laws.
In 2002, the Parliament continued its increasing responsiveness to NGOs and interest groups.
The Parliament has developed into a forum for policy debate, though it continues to lack the authority to take action on its own recommendations.
In August 2002, a group of 24 Parliamentarians forwarded an objection to passed legislation to the Constitutional Council; some MPs are outspoken members of opposition political groups.
The court system's independence is compromised by constitutional, legislative and administrative arrangements that subjugate the judiciary to the executive branch.
A presidential decree signed in 2000 modestly reduced executive branch control of the judiciary by moving responsibility for the courts' administration from the Justice Ministry to the Supreme Court.
The president has the power to appoint judges.
Judges are beholden to the executive branch and susceptible to corruption.
Though sill modest, their salaries have increased several times in recent years.
There is no tradition of judicial independence.
The constitution establishes the necessary procedures for a fair trial.
Trials are public, defendants have the right to be present, the right to counsel, and the right to be heard in court and call witnesses for the defense.
There is also a presumption of innocence and the right of appeal.
However, a gap exists between these principles and actual practice.
In a reform this year, the government lowered minimum criminal punishment requirements and implemented international standards in prisons.
In 2002, the Government prosecuted two leaders of a prominent opposition political movement for abuse of power during their tenures as public officials.
Although corruption is endemic in the government, there were widespread charges that the timing of the arrests was politically motivated.
Embassy observers at the trials noted that in both cases the prosecution failed to present evidence that the defendants had committed crimes, yet the judges sentenced them to 6 and 7 years in prison.
As the trials of the two opposition leaders proceeded over the summer, a new Law on Political Parties went into effect that required parties to have almost 10 times the number of members as under previous legislation.
The prosecutions and the new law appeared designed to put a brake on expanding political expression; however, there were other signs that significant dissent remained.
In spite of the restrictive new law, at least two opposition parties have conducted successful nationwide membership campaigns and one has been given temporary registration.
Although Kazakhstan is politically stable, concerns remain that political authoritarianism and corruption undermine its ability to pursue broad and lasting democratic reforms.
The Constitution and laws generally provide for basic freedoms; however, the government restricts these in practice, and democratic institutions remain weak.
Section 498A(a)(2): "make significant progress in, and is committed to the comprehensive implementation of, economic reform based on market principles, private ownership, and integration into the world economy, including implementation of the legal and policy frameworks necessary for such reform (including protection of intellectual property and respect for contracts)."
Since its independence in 1991, Kazakhstan has taken major steps toward developing a market-based economy and, as a result, has attracted over $18.4 billion in gross foreign direct investment, over half of it in the oil and gas sectors.
A bilateral investment treaty between the U.S. and Kazakhstan entered into force in January 1994.
A bilateral trade agreement has been in force since 1993 providing reciprocal Normal Trade Relations (NTR).
It has also been determined that Kazakhstan is compliant with the freedom of emigration provisions of the Jackson-Vanik amendment (subject to a semi-annual reporting requirement on its continued compliance with these provisions).
A U.S.-Kazakhstan Treaty on the Avoidance of Double Taxation also is in force.
Laws providing fair treatment for foreign investors are in place, although in practice they are not always fully implemented.
The American Chamber of Commerce is active in Almaty and the U.S.-Kazakhstan Business Association was created in 1999 in Washington, D.C.
The bulk of Kazakhstans economy is owned by private companies, including over 84% of small and medium enterprises.
68% of large firms are entirely or partially privatized (almost 50% are entirely privatized).
Private companies produce 75% of GDP and dominate almost all economic sectors.
Although the Government of Kazakhstan repeatedly has delayed the full privatization of several large enterprises, it has sold partial interests in many of these companies to private investors.
Kazakhstan's strong macroeconomic performance continued in 2002, with GDP growth expected to be at least 9% due to strong prices for Kazakhstani exports on world markets, solid economic conditions among its primary trading partners, and continued prudent macroeconomic policies.
Inflation has been in single digits for the last three years.
Kazakhstan established a National Fund with privatization revenues and higher than expected oil revenues, in order to ensure fiscal stability during periods of low oil prices.
The fund grew to $1.85 billion by December 2002.
Prudent and transparent management of the National Fund is a key issue between the IMF and the Government of Kazakhstan.
In March 2002, the U.S. Department of Commerce graduated Kazakhstan to market economy status under the U.S. anti-dumping law.
The change in status recognized substantive market economy reforms in the areas of currency convertibility, wage rate determination, openness to foreign investment, and government control over the means of production and allocation of resources.
Because of its strong macroeconomic performance and financial health, Kazakhstan became the first former Soviet Republic to repay all of its debt to the IMF in 2000, seven years ahead of schedule.
Economic growth in 2001, along with tax and financial sector reforms, has contributed to improved government finances.
A new tax code, which represents continued progress toward establishment of a transparent and effective tax system, went into effect in January 2002.
Kazakhstan also was able to reduce the Value Added Tax from 20 to 16 percent and reduce social (payroll) taxes in 2001.
In 2002, the Government drafted a new Customs Code, to increase efficiency and transparency in trade transactions, and a new Land Code, which allows privatization of agricultural land.
From 1993 through the first half of 2002, U.S. firms, led by oil and gas companies, have invested more than $6 billion out of gross foreign direct investment of $18.4 billion and are the largest investors in Kazakhstan.
Although the Government of Kazakhstan has taken many steps to create a more Western-style business environment, local and foreign businesses must deal with frequently changing and unevenly implemented legislation, a poorly functioning court system, frequent regulatory and personnel changes, and a cumbersome and often corrupt bureaucracy.
Foreign companies also are faced with difficulties obtaining work permits for expatriate employees as the Kazakhstan Government has pressured foreign firms to boost local employment and use local inputs.
More troubling were attempts by the Government to re-open contracts with foreign oil and gas companies, although President Nazarbayev has publicly stated that existing contracts will be honored.
The World Bank, Asian Development Bank, and European Bank for Reconstruction and Development are all active in Kazakhstan.
In 1993-2001, the World Bank had financed 15 projects in Kazakhstan and disbursed $1.14 billion for their implementation.
Currently, the World Bank has seven projects under implementation worth almost $460 million.
The EBRD primarily supports development of small and medium enterprises (SMEs), transport and communications infrastructure, financial institutions and industrial enterprises.
The ADB has provided technical assistance in 2002 in areas such as rural and agricultural development, road rehabilitation, promoting childhood development, and developing an energy strategy.
Kazakhstan applied for membership in the World Trade Organization (WTO) in 1996.
The U.S. has provided technical assistance in Kazakhstan's accession process.
Kazakhstan has submitted offers for services, technical barriers to trade, intellectual property policies, and SPS issues to the WTO Secretariat and engaged in multilateral and bilateral negotiations with WTO members, including the U.S., during 2002.
Although the Government of Kazakhstan has shown a renewed focus on WTO accession, much work remains to be done in the negotiation process for Kazakhstan's goods access offers to meet its future WTO partners' expectations.
Kazakhstan has endeavored to strengthen protections for intellectual property.
Kazakhstan joined the Bern Convention for the Protection of Literary and Artistic Works in 1999 and acceded to the Geneva Phonograms Convention in 2000.
Kazakhstan has signed but has not yet ratified the 1997 WIPO Copyright Treaty and the WIPO Performances and Phonograms Treaty.
Current laws, however, do not provide clear retroactive protection to sound recordings as required by the Bern Convention and TRIPS Agreement.
Nevertheless, the Government announced that in 2003 Kazakhstan intends to amend its Copyright Law to include additional provisions on retroactive protection of copyrights.
Despite an increase in confiscations of pirated goods and the gradual growth of licensed dealers, enforcement remains the most serious obstacle to a sound IPR regime.
The Government agency charged with IPR protection is under funded and the judicial system does not effectively prosecute IPR related cases.
Public awareness of IPR issues is growing due to Government and private sector efforts and the Government is actively working to inform judges and police about their responsibility to enforce IPR protections.
Section 498A(a)(3): "respect internationally recognized human rights, including the rights of minorities and the rights to freedom of religion and emigration."
The Government's poor human rights record worsened in 2002, and it continued to commit abuses.
Its adherence to OSCE commitments and respect for internationally recognized human rights suffered primarily in the areas of the independent media and opposition political expression.
In other areas, most notably prison reform, the steady progress seen in recent years has continued.
The gap between law, including the Constitution, and actual practice undermines citizens faith in public institutions and rule of law.
However, Presidential Nazarbayev created by decree the office of the Human Rights Ombudsman to investigate certain government abuses.
There were cases when members of the security forces beat or otherwise abused detainees.
There were instances of arbitrary arrest, and of individuals held in prolonged detention without charge.
On January 1, 2002, the administration of the prison system was transferred from the Interior Ministry to the Justice Ministry, a step human rights defenders advocated as essential to reduce abuse of prisoners.
Criminal actions taken against police for abusing detainees continue to increase, although human rights observers believe that the cases brought against police cover only a small fraction of the incidents, which they characterize as routine, and they assert that the legal system remains riddled by corruption.
The government has begun to take a more active role in efforts to improve prison conditions and the treatment of prisoners.
A government working group formed in 2001 to look into alternatives to confinement produced a draft law, which human rights defenders applauded and which passed the lower house of the Parliament in September 2002.
The proposed law contained more than 100 changes to the Codes governing sentencing.
The Constitution and the Media Law provide for freedom of speech and of the press; however, the Government used a variety of means - including criminal and administrative charges, physical attacks, and vandalism - throughout the year to silence its critics.
For example, one newspapers office was firebombed; an independent printing press was also firebombed; and a prominent journalist who wrote articles critical of the government was beaten shortly before he was to travel to Warsaw to attend the OSCE Human Dimension Review meeting to discuss media freedom in Kazakhstan.
Several newspapers and television stations were forced to close down.
As a consequence of these methods, many journalists practiced self-censorship; some have left the country.
Amendments to the Media Law from 2001 imposed foreign rebroadcast and Kazakh language requirements, giving the Government more tools to temporarily suspend or close at least five media outlets in 2002.
The amendments also expanded the exposure of media outlets for libel.
President Nazarbayev said in August that the Media Law should be amended again to further define journalists responsibility not to undermine the state and to create a journalistic code of ethics.
Despite this restrictive legislation, the Government continued to issue new licenses for various types of media and the overall number of media outlets increased, as it had over the previous year.
The Government continues to own some major printing and distribution facilities and to enjoy influence over most of those owned privately.
Publishing houses, which also are responsible legally for the information that they publish, were reluctant to publish anything that might contain "undesirable" stories.
While these limitations are not imposed by the government, they effectively limit the media's ability to publish strongly critical items.
Both the Criminal and Civil Codes contain articles establishing broad libel liability.
At the same time, two influential new newspapers are regularly publishing stories critical of the government.
The government sporadically infringes on citizens' rights to privacy.
Kazakhstan's authorities are believed to tap phones and monitor the correspondence of some members of the political opposition.
New legislation covering prosecutors, passed in August 2002, expanded the legal authority of the Government to monitor individuals activities.
Freedom of association, while generally respected, is sometimes hindered by complicated registration requirements for organizations; the minimum membership for a political party was raised to 50,000 under legislation passed in July 2002.
Freedom of assembly is restricted by requiring a permit to hold a demonstration or public meeting and groups must make requests for such permits at least ten days in advance.
Authorities have at times refused to issue such permits or have arrested demonstrators for not having one.
Courts fined some organizers of unsanctioned demonstrations.
Opposition activists have been denied permission to use rented facilities at the last minute, reportedly at the instruction of Kazakhstans security officials.
The Constitution provides for the right to emigrate and the right of repatriation; both are respected in practice.
Thus, since 1997, U.S. Presidents have determined that Kazakhstan meets the emigration requirements of Jackson-Vanik legislation.
In July 2001, the Government formally abolished the exit visa requirement for temporary travel of citizens.
The Committee for National Security (KNB) has legal authority to deny permission to travel in and out of the country, but emigration is not hindered.
Certain situations remain in which exit from the country may be denied, including pending criminal or civil legal proceedings, unserved prison sentences, evasion of duty as determined by a court of law, presentation of false documentation, or travel by active-duty military.
The government generally respects freedom of religion and most denominations worship without government interference.
However, local governments sometimes harass Islamic and Christian groups whose members they regard as religious extremists.
Representatives of Jehovah's Witnesses and some other non-traditional religions alleged incidents of harassment by local governments.
Government officials have frequently expressed concerns about the potential spread of religious extremism from other states.
Despite their concerns about regional security threats from groups claiming a religious basis, the government has refrained from imposing new legal restrictions on religious freedom.
The Constitutional Council ruled restrictive draft amendments to the Religion Law unconstitutional in April 2002 and the Government has made no effort to craft new amendments since.
The Constitution states that, "everyone is equal before law and court.
No one may be subjected to any discrimination for reasons of origin, social position, occupation, property status, sex, race, nationality, language, attitude to religion, convictions, place of residence, or any other circumstances."
In September 2002, the Government created the position of Human rights Ombudsman.
Although it is an institutionally weak office, its authority is much greater than that of the existing Presidential Human Rights Commission.
Kazakh is the state language, although Russian is officially recognized and widely used.
Minority ethnic groups are represented in the Government, but ethnic Kazakhs hold the majority of leadership positions.
Traditional cultural practices limit the role women and disabled persons play in society.
Women are limited in their ability to own and manage businesses or real property.
The President and other members of Government speak in support of women's rights and official state policy maintains that constitutional prohibitions on sex discrimination must be supported by effective government measures.
Three Government ministers are women.
There are laws mandating the provision of accessibility to public buildings and commercial establishments for the disabled; however, the Government does not enforce these laws and few accommodations exist in practice.
The Government provides almost no care for the mentally ill and mentally retarded due to a lack of resources.
The Constitution and the Labor Code guarantee basic worker rights, including the right to organize, to collective bargaining, and to strike; however, the Government has, at times, tried to limit the influence of independent trade unions, both directly and through its support for state-run unions.
The law does not provide mechanisms to protect workers who join independent trade unions from threats or harassment by enterprise management or state-run unions.
Section 498A(a){4): "respect international law and obligations and adhere to the Helsinki Final Act of the Conference on Security and Cooperation in Europe and the Charter of Paris, including the obligations to refrain from the threat or use of force and to settle disputes peacefully."
Kazakhstan has made a strong commitment to respect its international legal obligations and OSCE commitments to refrain from the threat or use of force and to settle disputes peaceably.
Kazakhstan is at peace with its neighbors and has defensive military forces that do not pose an offensive threat to the region.
Kazakhstan is also a strong proponent of dialogue and cooperation among the states of the former Soviet Union.
Kazakhstan is an active member of NATO's Partnership for Peace.
Section 498A(a}(5): "cooperate in seeking peaceful resolution of ethnic and regional conflicts."
Kazakhstan has been an active participant in coalition efforts to resolve the conflict in Afghanistan.
Kazakhstan provided a one-time donation of wheat to help feed the people of Afghanistan during the conflict.
Kazakhstan is committed to establishing a multi-ethnic national identity and is generally sensitive to the concerns of the large ethnic Russian community and the communities of the dozens of other nationalities that live in Kazakhstan.
Section 498A(a}(6): "implement responsible security policies, including
(A) adhering to arms control obligations derived from agreements signed by the former Soviet Union;
(B) reducing military forces and expenditures to a level consistent with legitimate defense requirements;
(C) not proliferating nuclear, biological, or chemical weapons, their delivery systems, or related technologies; and
(D) restraining conventional weapons transfers."
Kazakhstan continues to be a strong partner in preventing the proliferation of nuclear, biological and chemical materials of concern.
As a further sign of its commitment, in 2002 Kazakhstan became a member of the Nuclear Suppliers Group and ratified the bilateral Cooperative Threat Reduction Agreement with the U.S.
When the USSR broke up, Kazakhstan was one of the four Soviet successor states with nuclear weapons on its soil and the second Soviet successor state to accede to the NPT as a non-nuclear weapon state, doing so in February 1994.
All nuclear weapons were removed from its territory by the end of April 1995.
In August 1995, Kazakhstan's safeguards agreement with the International Atomic Energy Agency entered into force.
Kazakhstan is negotiating a regional nuclear weapon free zone treaty with other Central Asian nations.
It has also ratified the START treaty and eliminated all strategic offensive arms under START well ahead of schedule.
Kazakhstan is a successor state party to the INF and START treaties and has been an active participant in their implementation by virtue of its representation on those treaties' respective implementation commissions, the JCIC and SVC. Kazakhstan has indicated its wish to be considered a successor state under the ABM Treaty, and has participated in the SCC, the implementation commission established by that treaty.
Kazakhstan is also a signatory to the Comprehensive Test Ban Treaty.
Since 1994, Kazakhstan has been a member of the Moscow-based International Science and Technology Center, a multilateral nonproliferation program redirecting former weapons of mass destruction scientists to peaceful activities.
The government is also committed to maintaining a military force consistent with legitimate defense requirements.
The Government of Kazakhstan has consistently stated that it is against its policy to transfer conventional weapons to terrorist-list states, or to engage in the proliferation of nuclear, biological, or chemical weapons, their delivery systems, or related technology.
We are not aware that it has engaged in transfers of, or in the proliferation of, nuclear, biological, or chemical weapons, their delivery systems, or related technology.
However, the 1999 transfer of MiG-21 fighter aircraft from Kazakhstan to North Korea raised serious questions about the government's controls on conventional military technology and its commitment to non-proliferation in this area.
As a result of USG interaction with Kazakhstan on this matter, the government provided extensive, concrete nonproliferation commitments and agreed to take specific steps to ensure that no such transfers occur in the future.
In October 2002, Kazakhstan passed a new export control law, and U.S. export control cooperative efforts continue to work to prevent future transfers.
The U.S. has also urged the Government of Kazakhstan to ensure that its missile-related policies and practices are consistent with international standards, and in particular, the Missile Technology Control Regime.
Kazakhstan became a State Party to the Chemical Weapons Convention (CWC) on April 22, 2000.
In July 2001, U.S. experts completed the second site visit to three chemical weapons production facilities as part of the GOK undertakings regarding nonproliferation in the wake of the MiG transfers to North Korea.
A full assessment of these visits must be conducted before a judgement on Kazakhstan's compliance with the CWC can be made.
Kazakhstan is actively reviewing whether to become a State Party to the Biological Weapons Convention.
Kazakhstan ratified the CFE Treaty on October 30, 1992.
It ratified the CFE Flank Agreement on May 14, 1997.
Kazakhstani representatives have participated actively in the CFE Joint Consultative Group, the body responsible for CFE implementation, as well as in the CFE adaptation negotiations completed in November 1999.
Kazakhstan signed the CFE adaptation agreement at the November 1999 OSCE Summit in Istanbul.
Finally, Kazakhstan has never declared CFE Treaty-Limited Equipment in the portion of its territory covered by the Treaty.
It has provided annual notification that it has no TLE in the area of application in past years.
Kazakhstan is a participating State to the OSCE Vienna Document 1999 and its predecessor Vienna Document 1994.
The Vienna Document is an OSCE regime of confidence and security building measures.
Kazakhstan has submitted Confidence- and Security-Building Measures (CSBM) annual data declarations for the years 1995-2001 and has willingly undergone CSBM inspections and evaluation visits in accordance with the OSCE Vienna Document.
The U.S. worked closely with Kazakhstan to dismantle nuclear weapons facilities at Semipalatinsk and the destruction of delivery systems, including 147 SS-18 silo launchers.
The U.S. has also cooperated with the GOK to reduce the proliferation risk from former Soviet nuclear test site at Degelen Mountain.
Kazakhstan's full-scope IAEA safeguards agreement entered into force in August 1995.
Although Kazakhstan is not a member of the Nuclear Suppliers Group, it has expressed an interest in joining.
The Agreement for the Peaceful Uses of Nuclear Energy, signed by the United States and Kazakhstan in 1997 after Kazakhstan provided the requisite assurances of non-cooperation with proliferating states, entered into force in November 2000.
After Kazakhstan voluntarily shut down the BN-350 nuclear reactor at Aktau two years ahead of schedule, the United States and Kazakhstan completed the packaging of the spent nuclear fuel from the reactor on June 18, 2001, and continued cooperation on the decommissioning and safe shutdown of the reactor itself.
The U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission and the Kazakhstan Atomic Energy Committee also renewed their agreement for nuclear safety cooperation through 2004.
Prime Minister Tokayev issued a decree in October 1999 exempting from taxes U.S. assistance funds paid to Kazakhstan's scientists under the Initiative for Proliferation Prevention (IPP) projects, allowing the resumption of six projects that had been suspended over this issue and the funding of four new projects by the United States.
The USG has agreed to fund an "Ecological Survey of Industrial Sites" environmental monitoring project at Stepnogorsk through the International Science and Technology Center in cooperation with the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency.
Section 498A(a)(7): "take constructive actions to protect the international environment, prevent significant trans-border pollution, and promote sustainable use of natural resources."
Kazakhstan suffered severe environmental degradation under Soviet rule.
There is broad-based support for domestic protection of the environment.
The government's resources are inadequate to address some of the world's most challenging environmental problems: desiccation of the Aral Sea, protection of the fragile Caspian ecosystem, remediation of the Semipalatinsk nuclear testing range, clean-up of Baykonur launching facility, extremely polluted cities, desertification, and development of mechanisms for regional transboundary water management.
The government has shown an interest in regional cooperation on environmental policy and has agreed to the establishment of a coordination and information sharing mechanism as a first step toward fuller cooperation on trans-border and international environmental problems.
It has taken some steps to establish public policy mechanisms to address environmental issues, including reorganizing the Ministry of Natural Resources and Environmental Protection in 2002 into the Ministry of Environmental Protection and transferring the Committee on Water Management and Committee on Forestry, Fishery and Hunting to the Ministry of Agriculture.
National environmental NGOs are gaining access to the policy-making process on environmental issues.
Kazakhstan has also expressed willingness to cooperate in developing laws on water rights and water user associations with other countries in the region.
It is an active member of the Interstate Coordination Water Commission of Central Asia.
Kazakhstan signed and ratified the Aarhus Convention on environmental information in 2002.
It also began implementation of a main principal of the Rio+10 Declaration: public access to environmental information.
It contributed to the development of the Regional Environmental Action Plan for Central Asia, which Kazakhstani representatives presented at the 2002 World Summit on Sustainable Development.
In 1999, Kazakhstan signed and deposited its instruments of ratification of the Convention on International Trade in Endangered Species (CITES), which will facilitate further efforts to conserve threatened and endangered species in the area.
It has taken active measures to comply with CITES quotas on Caspian sturgeon fishing.
In 2002, the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service conducted a training workshop related to CITES implementation, obligations, and enforcement.
Kazakhstan discusses Caspian Sea environmental protection issues regularly with the other Caspian littoral states.
Kazakhstan has been an active and constructive player in regional and international efforts to alleviate the deteriorating environmental conditions and fosters regional cooperation in the Aral Sea basin.
Kazakhstan has worked with the World Bank and international donors on a 15-20 year plan to stabilize the Aral Sea.
To address the water management problem of the Syr Darya River, Kazakhstan and other basin states, with technical assistance from USAID/Central Asia, established the 1998 Framework Agreement on the Use of Water and Energy Resources of the Syr Darya Basin.
The United States and the European Union have worked together with the Ministry of Environmental Protection to establish an independent, non-profit, and non-political Regional Environmental Center {REC) in Almaty in 2001.
The mission of the REC is to strengthen civil society and support sustainable development by promoting public awareness and participation in environmental decision-making among the countries of Central Asia.
In 2002, the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency, U.S. Embassy and Ministry of Environmental Protection signed a Memorandum of Understanding to provide the REC with funding for its grants program.
Section 498A(a){8): "deny support for acts of international terrorism."
Kazakhstan does not grant sanctuary from prosecution to individuals or groups that have committed acts of international terrorism or otherwise support international terrorism.
Kazakhstan has strongly supported U.S. actions against the perpetrators of the September 11, 2001 terrorist attacks on the United States.
President Nazarbayev has frequently and publicly reiterated his support for the U. S. in the fight against international terrorism.
In addition to its public support for U.S. efforts, Kazakhstan granted the U.S. permission to use its airspace for military and humanitarian flights, with over 800 U.S. overflights in support of OEF in 2002.
Kazakhstan has offered the U. S. use of its military bases, if needed.
In July 2002, Kazakhstan signed an agreement to use Almaty Airport as a divert airfield for OEF. Kazakhstan offered to supply food and fuel to U.S. forces in Central Asia; it provided wheat for humanitarian relief efforts and offered a peacekeeping battalion for post-conflict peacekeeping efforts in Afghanistan.
Kazakhstan also has been actively searching for terrorist financial assets in Kazakhstan and has blocked the assets of an individual listed on the E.O. 13223 terrorist list.
Kazakhstan is a party to nine of the twelve international counter-terrorism conventions.
In 2002, it ratified the Convention for the Suppression of Terrorist Bombings and the Convention for Suppression of the Financing of Terrorism.
A third (on the Physical Protection of Nuclear Material) is in the process of ratification.
The two on which it has not yet acted are the Conventions for the Suppression of Unlawful Acts against the Safety of Maritime Navigation (Rome-1988) and for the Suppression of Unlawful Acts against the Safety of Fixed Platforms located on the Continental Shelf (Rome -1991).
Also in 2002, Kazakhstan enacted tougher anti-terrorism laws with increased penalties.
Section 498A(a)(9): "accept responsibility for paying an equitable portion of the indebtedness to United States firms incurred by the former Soviet Union."
In October 1991, shortly before the Soviet Union dissolved, Russia and nine other Soviet republics signed a Memorandum of Understanding declaring themselves jointly and severally liable for the foreign debts of the Soviet Union.
In December 1991, Russia and seven other republics signed an agreement that assigned to each of the newly independent states a share of all the external assets and foreign debt of the former Soviet Union (FSU).
Kazakhstan signed both the October and December 1991 agreements.
The December 1991 agreement provided that Kazakhstan's share of the FSU debt would be 3.86 percent.
Beginning in 1992, Russia sought to replace the joint and several liability principle by seeking full liability for the foreign debt of the FSU in return for all the external assets of the FSU.
On September 6, 1993, Kazakhstan signed a "double zero option" agreement with Russia under which Russia agreed to pay Kazakhstan's share of the foreign debt of the FSU in return for Kazakhstan's share of the external assets of the FSU.
Please see section 498(a}(9) of the Russia FSA report regarding indebtedness to the United States incurred by the former Soviet Union.
Section 498A(a)(10): "cooperate with the United States government in uncovering all evidence regarding Americans listed as prisoners-of-war, or otherwise missing during American operations, who were detained in the former Soviet Union during the Cold War."
The U.S. effort to uncover evidence of American POWs and MIAs in the former Soviet Union is being conducted through the U.S.-Russian Joint Commission on POWs/MIAs that was established in March 1992.
The U.S. side of the Commission visited Kazakhstan in August 1994 and Kazakhstan promised cooperation on the POW/MIA effort.
The government has been cooperative with all related interviews conducted in Kazakhstan.
Section 498A(a)(11): "terminate support for the communist regime in Cuba, including removal of troops, closing of military and intelligence facilities, including the military and intelligence facilities at Lourdes and Cienfuegos, and ceasing trade subsidies and economic, nuclear, and other assistance."
We have no evidence from which to conclude that the Government of Kazakhstan is providing military, intelligence, economic, nuclear, or other assistance to the Government of Cuba.
CHECKLIST FOR GROUNDS OF INELIGIBILITY UNDER SECTION 498(b) OF THE FOREIGN ASSISTANCE ACT OF 1961
KAZAKHSTAN
Section 498A(b)(1): Has the President determined that the Government of Kazakhstan has engaged in a consistent pattern of gross violations of internationally recognized human rights or of international law?
No.
Although Kazakhstans human rights record worsened in 2002, its Government did not engage in a consistent pattern of gross human rights violations.
The most troubling negative developments were the selective prosecutions and convictions of two opposition politicians on corruption charges, the suspension or closure of five independent media outlets, and harassment of multiple independent journalists.
These setbacks occurred alongside limited positive developments, including the temporary registration of a major new opposition party, successful nationwide registration campaigns conducted by two opposition parties, and the emergence of new progressive media outlets publishing articles critical of the government.
In 2002, the Government continued its laudable progress on prison reform and created a Human Rights Ombudsman.
Draft legislation to restrict religious freedom was struck down as unconstitutional.
On the troubling issues, the United States and its Embassy have expressed strong and consistent concern through diplomatic efforts and will continue to exert pressure on the Government.
Our assistance programs are instrumental in promoting human rights and international standards, and relied upon by a burgeoning civil society.
Improvement of Kazakhstan's human rights situation will depend in part on continued engagement and assistance from the United States.
Section 498A(b)(2): has the President determined that the Government of Kazakhstan has failed to take constructive actions to facilitate the effective implementation of applicable arms control obligations derived from agreements signed by the former Soviet Union?
No.
Kazakhstan has been a leader in nuclear nonproliferation.
It has eliminated all strategic offensive arms under START I well ahead of schedule.
Kazakhstan deposited its instrument of accession to the NPT in 1994, ratified the Comprehensive Test Ban Treaty, and become a member of the Nuclear Suppliers Club.
Section 498A(b)(3): has the President determined that, after October 24, 1992, the Government of Kazakhstan knowingly transferred to another country
(A) missiles or missile technology inconsistent with the guidelines and parameters of the Missile Technology control Regime; or
(B) any material equipment, or technology that would contribute significantly to the ability of such country to manufacture any weapon of mass destruction (including nuclear, chemical, and biological weapons) if the President determine [d] that the material, equipment, or technology was to be used by such country in the manufacture of such weapon?
No such determinations have been made.
Section 498A(b)(4): Is the Government of Kazakhstan prohibited from receiving such assistance by section 101 or 102 of the arms Export Control Act or sections 306(a)(1) and 307 of he Chemical and Biological Weapons Control and Warfare Elimination Act of 1991?
No.
We do not have information from which to conclude that Kazakhstan is prohibited from receiving assistance under these statues.
Section 498A(b)(5): has the President determined and certified to the appropriate congressional committees that the Government of Kazakhstan is providing assistance for, or engaging in, non-market-based trade (as defined in section 498(k)(3) with the Cuban Government? If so, has the President taken action to withhold assistance from Kazakhstan under the Foreign Assistance Act within 30 days of such a determination, or has Congress enacted legislation disapproving the determination within that 30 day period?
No.
The President has not determined that the Government of Kazakhstan is providing assistance for, or engaging in any non-market-based trade, with the Cuban Government.
CRITERIA FOR U.S. ASSISTANCE UNDER SECTION 498A(a) OF THE FOREIGN ASSISTANCE ACT OF 1961
KYRGYZ REPUBLIC
Section 201 of the FREEDOM Support Act amended Section 498A of the Foreign Assistance Act of 1961 to require that the President "take into account not only relative need but also the extent to which that independent state is acting to:"
Section 498A(a)(1): "make significant progress toward, and is committed to the comprehensive implementation of, a democratic system based on principles of the rule of law, individual freedoms, and representative government determined by free and fair elections."
The Kyrgyz Republic has expressed a commitment to the protection of human rights, democracy and the rule of law.
Although the 1993 Constitution defines the form of government as a democratic republic, President Askar Akayev dominates the government.
Earlier this year, President Akayev announced that he would step down when he completes his third term in 2005.
Despite constitutional limitations, Parliament has become more independent and has modified or blocked presidential initiatives.
In October 2002, regional by-elections for seats in the Kyrgyz Legislative Assembly (lower house) were held in Osh.
Despite improvements in electoral law and regulation, and participation by independent domestic observers, the by-elections were marred by serious violations, including illegal ballot issuances, multiple voting, family voting, and moderate interference with election observers.
Also, there is a case of one candidate who won 46 percent of the vote but was disqualified on charges of alleged false financial reporting.
In August 2002, a constitutional assembly was formed by decree of President Akayev to recommend revisions to the Constitution that would strengthen democracy.
The assembly met in September and issued a list of proposals aimed at enhancing the authority and autonomy of the Parliament, enhancing the independence of the judiciary, and promoting local self-government.
A national referendum on the proposed constitutional amendments will take place in 2003.
The Parliament has become more independent, initiated its own legislation, and on occasions overrode presidential vetoes in defense of its own legislative priorities.
In the past, the parliament and the president have worked together to pass significant reforms of the criminal, civil and commercial codes and to begin the process of privatizing state industry and state-owned commercial enterprises.
In January a prominent member of Parliament was arrested and charged for abuse of power seven years earlier, but was eventually released after months of citizen protests.
In 2002, Parliament passed legislation to create an ombudsman, and proposed legislation to decriminalize libel, and reform the educational system.
The constitution also provides for an independent judiciary, but despite extensive judicial reforms and a large body of new law, the judiciary continues to be dominated by the executive branch; the Government used judicial proceedings against prominent political opposition and independent media figures in numerous instances.
In May a leading opposition leader was sentenced to ten years in prison.
Trials of six local law enforcement officers involved in the Aksy killings of five protestors began in late September but were postponed after protesters disrupted the proceedings; citizens continued to call for higher-ranking officials to face accountability.
Civil society continues to be the most vibrant and viable in the region.
A large and active NGO community has been able to focus and organize public demands.
Oppositionists and human rights activists organized two national Kurultais (people's assemblies) for public discussion of political issues in 2002; however, they were prevented from meeting in the capitol.
Parliament sometimes acts in partnership with NGOs and civil society and has held hearings on issues of public interest, including human rights.
There are numerous independent newspapers and magazines in the Kyrgyz Republic that are often critical of the government.
Although, in principle, they are allowed to operate freely, most face periodic harassment from executive and judicial authorities.
In May 2002, the Kyrgyz government rescinded Decree Number 20 that had severely restricted freedom of the press.
Despite its expressed commitment to protect human rights, the governments record in practice is poor in many areas.
In the last year, there were credible reports of police abuse and brutality, and there are reports of numerous cases of arbitrary arrest and detention.
The Kyrgyz Republic's constitution provides substantial guarantees of rights for its citizens, including members of non-Kyrgyz ethnic groups.
Nevertheless, despite efforts by President Akayev to mitigate the effects of Kyrgyz nationalism, the ethnic Russian and Uzbek populations continue to complain of discrimination by ethnic Kyrgyz officials.
Section 498A(a)(2): "make significant progress in, and is committed to the comprehensive implementation of, economic reform based on market principles, private ownership, and integration into the world economy, including implementation of the legal and policy frameworks necessary for such reform (including protection of intellectual property and respect for contracts)."
The Kyrgyz Republic has made important progress in restructuring its economic system and implementing legislation that will be the basis for a market economy.
The national currency, the som, was introduced in May 1993, and parliament has adopted key legislation on privatization, joint ventures, foreign trade and investment and free economic zones.
Most small and medium enterprises have been privatized.
A trade agreement with the United States provides for reciprocal Normal Trade Relations (formerly Most Favored Nation) status and contains intellectual property rights (IPR) provisions.
The Kyrgyz government has taken some steps to meet the IPR provision of the agreement, but enforcement remains weak.
An Overseas Private Investment Corporation (OPIC) agreement is also in force.
A bilateral investment treaty with the United States entered into force in January 1994.
The Kyrgyz Republic has committed to avoid imposing restrictions on payments for current international transactions and avoid engaging in multiple currency practices or discriminatory currency arrangements.
The Kyrgyz Republic is a member of the International Monetary Fund (IMF), World Bank, European Bank for Reconstruction and Development, and the Asian Development Bank.
In December 1998 the Kyrgyz Republic was the first former Soviet state to become a member of the WTO.
In June 2000, it was graduated from the application of the Jackson-Vanik amendment of Title IV of the Trade Act of 1974.
The Kyrgyz Republic has distinguished itself by adopting relatively liberal economic policies and achieving six straight years of real economic growth.
Growth reached 5.3 percent in 2001.
While analysts expect a drop to just under 1 percent this year, due to reduced gold and energy exports, both the Government and the IMF project a rebound next year.
Inflation has been moderate, at 3.7 percent for 2001.
The fiscal deficit remains substantial, at 5.2 percent of GDP last year, but the government has made steady strides in controlling it.
Tax revenue remains low, at 12.1 percent of GDP in 2001, but the government has taken steps to rationalize the tax structure in hopes of encouraging greater compliance.
The external outlook of the Kyrgyz Republic has stabilized since 1998.
The Kyrgyz Republic was the first Central Asian republic to embark on an IMF reform program.
In 2001, the IMF approved a three-year, USD 93 million Poverty Reduction and Growth Facility (PRGF) and the Fund completed the first review in July, 2002.
The Paris Club approved a non-concessional debt flow rescheduling in March for the Kyrgyz Republic (an IDA-only country), and a goodwill clause provides for a stock rescheduling available upon successful completion of the PRGF.
The current account deficit should rise slightly from last year's 3.3 percent of GDP, but expected capital inflows should cover this amount.
Renewed confidence in the Kyrgyz currency (som) has permitted high money growth without inflation, and international reserves (valued at more than four months' imports) have exceeded IMF targets.
While exports can be volatile, due to fluctuations in gold prices and electricity sales, the Kyrgyz government is focused on promoting export growth.
As part of this strategy, the Kyrgyz government is working to attract foreign investment.
Growth and increased social spending have helped the Kyrgyz Republic to reduce poverty.
A World Bank survey found that poverty fell from 52 percent in 2000 to 48 percent in 2001.
In April, the government adopted measures to increase the lowest government salaries and pensions to compensate for a 42 percent electricity tariff increase, leading to a 5 percent real increase in social spending.
The Kyrgyz government is focused on promoting economic growth as the surest path to poverty reduction and hosted a Consultative Group meeting in October to present the National Strategy for Poverty Reduction.
Section 498A(a)(3): "respect internationally recognized human rights, including the rights of minorities and the rights to freedom of religion and emigration."
The Kyrgyz Republics human rights record remained poor, and indeed worsened in some areas, however, there were some positive developments.
NGOs and Parliament deputies on occasion succeeded in blocking presidential initiatives through parliamentary action and grassroots campaigns.
There were credible reports of police abuse and brutality.
Prison conditions are very poor, and there were many cases of arbitrary arrest and detention.
The Constitution provides citizens with the right to assemble freely; however, at times the Government restricted this right in practice.
On occasion the Government used force, including lethal force, to disrupt peaceful demonstrations.
At a March demonstration police shot and killed five unarmed protesters.
On September 7, the Government issued a proposal to ban rallies, demonstrations, and street protests for three months.
Following widespread criticism, the draft bill was withdrawn ten days later.
The law provides for freedom of speech and of the press; however, the Government routinely restricts these rights.
Journalists have been arrested on several occasions on criminal libel charges.
Several of these journalists have served time in jail, but most were either immediately freed or, if convicted, were released with credit for time served.
President Akayev has sought to reassure ethnic minorities while simultaneously trying to satisfy the aspirations of ethnic Kyrgyz for greater national identity.
The new constitution includes substantial protection for individuals, including non-ethnic Kyrgyz.
Concerns remain over ethnic discrimination, but in general the situation for minorities has improved, and emigration, while free, has decreased.
The Kyrgyz constitution provides for freedom of religion.
The government does not support any specific religion and expressly forbids religious instruction in government schools.
The government does not, however, fully protect religious rights.
A 1996 law requires that religious groups register with the State Commission on Religious Affairs.
In practice, the Commission requires each congregation to register separately and does not always process the applications promptly.
Although the USG has not documented instances in 2000 or 2001of the Commission refusing religious groups attempts to register, there are credible reports that congregations of all-Kyrgyz Christians remain unregistered either because they are fearful to register or because they have been refused.
Fearful of the rise of violent Muslim extremism in the region, the government recently drafted a new law on religion.
OSCE experts and others criticized the draft as unduly restrictive and it was dropped for this past legislative year.
There are reports that Muslim groups and mosques have recently received increased scrutiny, and that some domestic religious groups have experienced governmental interference, especially in rural areas.
Although there is no law on emigration, administrative procedures provide for the free movement of people.
Emigrants are not prevented from returning to the country, and there is reportedly a small but steady flow of returnees.
Section 498A(a)(4): "respect international law and obligations and adhere to the Helsinki Final Act of the Conference on Security and Cooperation in Europe and the Charter of Paris, including the obligations to refrain from the threat or use of force and to settle disputes peacefully."
The Kyrgyz Republic has made a strong commitment to the observance of international legal obligations and OSCE commitments.
The OSCE opened an office in the Kyrgyz Republic in January 1999.
The Kyrgyz Republic is at peace with its neighbors, and is also a strong proponent of dialogue and cooperation among the states of the former Soviet Union.
The Kyrgyz Republic participates in Partnership for Peace exercises.
It also participates with neighboring Uzbekistan and Kazakhstan in a Central Asian Peacekeeping Battalion.
The Kyrgyz Republic cooperated with its neighbors in 1999 and 2000 to repulse a Tajikistan-based group of armed insurgents, led by the Islamic Movement of Uzbekistan, who took hostages in the southern part of the country.
Section 498A(a)(5): "cooperate in seeking peaceful resolution of ethnic and regional conflicts."
The Government of the Kyrgyz Republic is committed to establishing a multi-ethnic national identity and is particularly sensitive to the concerns of the non-Kyrgyz ethnic groups in the Kyrgyz Republic, although there are credible allegations of discrimination on the part of individual government officials.
Section 498A(a)(6): "implement responsible security policies, including--
(A) adhering to arms control obligations derived from agreements signed by the former Soviet Union;
(B) reducing military forces and expenditures to a level consistent with legitimate defense requirements;
(C) not proliferating nuclear, biological, or chemical weapons, their delivery systems, or related technologies; and
(D) restraining conventional weapons transfers."
The Government of the Kyrgyz Republic has formally declared its willingness and intent to accept all of the relevant arms control obligations of the former Soviet Union.
The Kyrgyz Republic acceded to the NPT, as a non-nuclear weapon state, on July 5, 1994.
The Kyrgyz Republic signed its NPT safeguards agreement with the International Atomic Energy Agency on March 18, 1998 (Note: However, it does not appear that the agreement has entered into force.).
The Kyrgyz Republic is also committed to maintaining a small, defensive military force and National Guard.
The Kyrgyz Republic has said that it is strongly opposed to the proliferation of weapons of mass destruction, their delivery systems or related technologies.
The government is taking steps to establish a functioning system of export controls, including work on a new export control law.
We have received occasional reports of transfers or potential transfers of conventional weapons to state sponsors of terrorism from or through the Kyrgyz Republic, which we carefully review in light of our legal obligations under the various proliferation sanctions laws.
None of these reports resulted in a sanctions determination during the reporting period.
We are not aware that the government of the Kyrgyz Republic has engaged in the proliferation of nuclear, biological, or chemical weapons, their delivery systems, or related technology.
The Kyrgyz Republic is a signatory to, but has yet to ratify, the 1993 Chemical Weapons Convention.
Additionally, the Kyrgyz Republic has acknowledged it is a successor to the former Soviet Unions obligations under the INF Treaty.
Although it does not actively participate in the Special Verification Commission, it continues to observe the Treatys obligations.
The Kyrgyz Republic has not acceded to the 1972 Biological Weapons Convention.
The Kyrgyz Republic has not become a State Party to the 1972 Biological Weapons Convention.
In accordance with OSCE Vienna Document 1994 and its successor Vienna Document 1999, the Kyrgyz Republic has submitted Confidence- and Security-Building Measures (CSBM) annual data declarations for each year 1995-2001, but sometimes late and its data as of January 1, 2002, was not provided on time in December 2002.
The Kyrgyz Republic has willingly undergone CSBM inspections and evaluation visits in accordance with the OSCE Vienna Document.
The Government of the Kyrgyz Republic signed the Open Skies Treaty in 1992, but the Parliament has not yet approved it.
The Treaty entered into force on January 1, 2002.
Section 498A(a)(7): "take constructive actions to protect the international environment, prevent significant trans-border pollution, and promote sustainable use of natural resources."
The Kyrgyz Republic suffered severe environmental degradation under Soviet rule, and there is broad-based support for domestic protection of the environment.
The Kyrgyz Republic has shown an interest in regional cooperation on environmental issues, and has agreed to the establishment of a coordination and information sharing mechanism as a first step toward fuller cooperation on trans-border and international environmental issues.
The Kyrgyz Republic is actively involved in bio-diversity issues and is working with international donors to advance bio-diversity studies.
The Government of the Kyrgyz Republic has taken steps to establish public policy mechanisms to address environmental issues, including the establishment of a State Committee on Environmental Protection.
National environmental NGOs continue to improve their access to the policy-making process on environmental issues.
The Kyrgyz Republic joined the other Central Asian states in the decision to locate the headquarters of a Regional Environmental Center (REC) in Almaty, Kazakhstan.
The United States and the European Union support the establishment of this independent, non-profit, and non-political organization, the mission of which will be to strengthen civil society and support sustainable development by promoting public awareness and participation in regional environmental decision-making.
The Kyrgyz Republic has been an active and constructive player in regional and international efforts to alleviate the deteriorating environmental conditions and to foster regional cooperation in the Aral Sea basin.
The Government of the Kyrgyz Republic has worked with the World Bank and international donors on a 15- to 20- year plan to stabilize the Aral Sea.
In October, the Kyrgyz Republic hosted the Global Mountain Summit which attracted over 500 participants from mountain nations, UN organizations, and interested NGOs to focus on partnerships for sustainable development, and mechanisms for conservation of mountain biodiversity.
Section 498A(a)(8): "deny support for acts of international terrorism."
The Government of the Kyrgyz Republic does not grant sanctuary from prosecution to individuals or groups that have committed acts of international terrorism or otherwise support international terrorism.
The Kyrgyz Republic is a party to six of the twelve international counter-terrorism conventions.
The government has been extremely supportive of the U.S.-led counter-terrorism coalition, allowing deployment of coalition aircraft from a civilian airport near the capital for operations in Afghanistan.
Section 498A(a)(9): "accept responsibility for paying an equitable portion of the indebtedness to United States firms incurred by the former Soviet Union."
In October 1991, shortly before the Soviet Union dissolved, Russia and nine other Soviet republics signed a Memorandum of Understanding declaring themselves jointly and severally liable for the pre-October 1991 debt to foreign creditors of the Soviet Union.
In December 1991, Russia and seven other republics signed an agreement which assigned to each of the newly independent states a share of all the external assets and foreign debt of the former Soviet Union (FSU).
The Kyrgyz Republic signed both the October and December 1991 agreements.
The December 1991 agreement provided that the Kyrgyz Republic's share of the FSU debt would be 0.95 percent.
In 1992, Russia sought to replace the joint and several liability principle by seeking full liability for the debt in return for all the external assets.
In August 1992, the Kyrgyz Republic signed a "zero option" agreement with Russia under which Russia will pay the Kyrgyz Republic's share of the debt in return for its share of the assets.
Please see section 498A(a)(9) of the Russia FSA report regarding indebtedness to the United States incurred by the former Soviet Union.
Section 498A(a)(10): "cooperate with the United States Government in uncovering all evidence regarding Americans listed as prisoners-of-war, or otherwise missing during American operations, who were detained in the former Soviet Union during the Cold War."
The U.S. effort to uncover evidence of American POWs and MIAs in the former Soviet Union is being conducted through the U.S.-Russian Joint Commission on POWs/MIAs that was established in March 1992.
In November 1995, the U.S. side of this Commission made a successful visit to the Kyrgyz Republic.
The Commission met with senior government officials, including President Akayev.
All officials cooperated fully and pledged to do their utmost to locate information on American POWs/MIAs.
There is no evidence of any American POWs/MIAs in the Kyrgyz Republic.
Section 498A(a)(11): "terminate support for the communist regime in Cuba, including removal of troops, closing of military and intelligence facilities, including the military and intelligence facilities at Lourdes and Cienfuegos, and ceasing trade subsidies and economic, nuclear, and other assistance."
We have no evidence from which to conclude that the Government of the Kyrgyz Republic is providing military, intelligence, economic, nuclear, or other assistance to the Government of Cuba.
CHECKLIST FOR GROUNDS OF INELIGIBILITY UNDER SECTION 498A(b) OF THE FOREIGN ASSISTANCE ACT OF 1961
KYRGYZ REPUBLIC
Section 498A(b)(1): Has the President determined that the Government of the Kyrgyz Republic has "engaged in a consistent pattern of gross violations of internationally recognized human rights or of international law"?
No.
We do not believe that the Government of the Kyrgyz Republic is engaged in such a pattern.
Nonetheless, we will work to better address existing problems in the area of democracy and human rights both through diplomatic efforts and with assistance programs.
Section 498A(b)(2): Has the President determined that the Government of the Kyrgyz Republic "has failed to take constructive actions to facilitate the effective implementation of applicable arms control obligations derived from agreements signed by the former Soviet Union"?
No.
We do not believe that the Government of the Kyrgyz Republic has failed to take such actions.
Section 498A(b)(3): Has the President determined that, after October 24, 1992, the Government of the Kyrgyz Republic "knowingly transferred to another country --
(A) missiles or missile technology inconsistent with the guidelines and parameters of the Missile Technology Control Regime; or
(B) any material, equipment, or technology that would contribute significantly to the ability of such country to manufacture any weapon of mass destruction (including nuclear, chemical, and biological weapons) if the President determine[d] that the material, equipment, or technology was to be used by such country in the manufacture of such weapon"?
No.
No such determinations have been made.
Section 498A(b)(4): Is the Government of the Kyrgyz Republic "prohibited from receiving such assistance by section 101 or 102 of the Arms Export Control Act or sections 306(a)(1) and 307 of the Chemical and Biological Weapons Control and Warfare Elimination Act of 1991"?
No.
We do not have information from which to conclude that the Government of the Kyrgyz Republic is prohibited from receiving assistance by these sections.
Section 498A(b)(5): Has the President determined and certified within 30 days to the appropriate congressional committees that the Government of the Kyrgyz Republic "is providing assistance for, or engaging in, non-market-based trade (as defined in section 498B(k)(3)) with the Cuban Government? If so, has the President taken action to withhold assistance from the Kyrgyz Republic under the Foreign Assistance Act with 30 days of such a determination, or has Congress enacted legislation disapproving the determination with that 30-day period?"
No.
The President has not determined that the Government of the Kyrgyz Republic is providing assistance for, or engaging in any non-market-based trade with, the Cuban government.
CRITERIA FOR U.S. ASSISTANCE UNDER SECTION 498A(a) OF THE FOREIGN ASSISTANCE ACT OF 1961
MOLDOVA
Section 201 of the FREEDOM Support Act amended Section 498A of the Foreign Assistance Act of 1961 to require that the President "take into account not only relative need but also the extent to which that independent state is acting to:"
Section 498A(a)(1): "make significant progress toward, and is committed to the comprehensive implementation of, a democratic system based on principles of the rule of law, individual freedoms, and representative government determined by free and fair elections."
Throughout FY 2002, the Moldovan government continued to maintain its commitment to democracy and the rule of law.
In September 2000, Moldova implemented a constitutional amendment eliminating popular presidential elections and giving Parliament the authority to elect the President.
The amendment also removed the President's authority to initiate legislation in Parliament.
In December 2000, Parliament held the first parliamentary presidential election, but failed to elect a President in the statutorily-allowed two rounds.
As a result, then-President Lucinschi dissolved Parliament and set early parliamentary elections for February 25, 2001.
The Communists received 50 percent of the total vote and 71 seats in Parliament in voting that OSCE/ODIHR (Office of Democratic Institutions and Human Rights) observers declared free and fair.
Parliament selected Communist Party Chairman Vladimir Voronin as President on April 4.
Parliament adopted in December 2001 a package of constitutional amendments to revise the current territorial-administrative system, replacing Moldova's current 13 counties and special municipalities with 36 smaller territorial units, and strengthening the central government's control over local operations.
The Constitutional Court approved the territorial re-organization in March 2002, but struck down provisions to eliminate direct election of mayors and institute the new system immediately by cutting short current office-holders terms.
Nationwide local elections are now scheduled for May 2003.
Section 498A(a)(2): "make significant progress in, and is committed to the comprehensive implementation of economic reform based on market principles, private ownership, and integration into the world economy including implementation of the legal and policy frameworks necessary for such reform (including protection of intellectual property and respect for contracts)."
Moldova continues to make progress toward developing a viable free-market economy.
Moldova will record its third consecutive year of GDP growth in 2002, with year-end real GDP growth predicted at 6 percent.
This growth rate is impressive considering that, prior to 2000, Moldova had recorded only one year of GDP growth since independence.
Equally impressive, the 2002 inflation rate is estimated to be 8 percent, and the budget deficit to be 1.2 percent of GDP.
Sporadic and ineffective enforcement of the law combined with economic and political uncertainty and low levels of income continue to discourage inflows of foreign direct investment.
Moldova remains the poorest country in Europe, with GDP per capita at $406.
Moldova has adopted the basic reforms necessary for a market economy: prices have been largely freed, foreign trade has been almost fully liberalized, and the Moldovan leu is fully convertible for current account transactions.
The government has improved customs collections, but needs to reinstate pre-shipment inspections to meet International Monetary Fund (IMF) conditionality for the next tranche of its Poverty Reduction Growth Facility (PRGF).
Customs revenues increased substantially while these inspections were in place.
Export quotas have been eliminated, and import tariffs have been substantially reduced.
Moldova became a member of the World Trade Organization in 2001.
Moldova enjoys permanent Normal Trade Relations with the United States subject to satisfying Jackson-Vanik legislations semiannual reporting requirement.
The IMF approved a PGRF for Moldova in December 2000 but lending was suspended.
In 2002, IMF and World Bank lending resumed with Moldova receiving $12 million from the IMF and $10 million from the World Bank.
The World Bank and IMF have laid out conditions for Moldova to meet before further assistance will be disbursed.
Moldova continues to make progress integrating into the world economy through market-based economic reforms and privatization.
A law governing the sale and purchase of land took effect in September 1997.
Citizens and foreign investors can buy and sell land at market prices.
More than 900 former collective farms were privatized as a result of the land privatization efforts, and about one million Moldovan citizens received land titles through 2001.
A largely completed enterprise privatization program fully privatized 2,114 enterprises from many economic sectors, with an additional 321 enterprises privatized in cases where the state holds less than 49 percent of the shares.
Privatization results in FY02 were mixed: several small companies and two wineries were privatized; but the Government of Moldova (GOM) was unable to privatize several larger state enterprises, notably Moldtelecom.
In February 2000, the Spanish firm Union Fenosa purchased three of Moldova's five electrical distribution companies.
The GOM issued two tenders for sale of the remaining two distribution companies in 2000 and 2001.
The first tender failed to secure bids of sufficient value, and the second was withdrawn as a result of concerns over bid levels and transparency.
In 2002, the GOM agreed to work with a consultant to privatize the remaining firms.
In November 2002, the Supreme Court upheld a lower courts finding of irregularities in the 2000 Union Fenosa purchase.
The GoM insisted that the courts ruling was directed at Moldovans involved in the privatization, and not at Union Fenosa.
Nevertheless, the court ruling has damaged Moldovas image amongst foreign investors.
During 2002, the GoM attempted to privatize the state telecommunications company, MoldTelecom.
However, in November, the GoM turned down the only purchase offer from MGTS, a Russian firm.
Some independent observers have reported that the MGTS proposal contained market-distorting technical conditions.
Section 498A(a)(3): "respect internationally recognized human rights, including the rights of minorities and the rights to freedom of religion and emigration."
The government generally respects the human rights of its citizens despite continuing problems in some areas.
The situation is worse in the separatist Transnistria region, which is not under the control of the Moldovan central authorities.
Moldovan law prohibits abusive proselytizing, although the government generally recognizes freedom of religion and has never taken legal action against individuals for proselytizing.
Observers say journalists frequently practice self-censorship because of a provision in the press law that allows public figures to sue for defamation without distinction between their public and private persons.
The 1994 constitution provides the legal framework to ensure protection of minority rights, and has received positive assessments from international experts.
The Gagauz, a Turkish-speaking minority in southern Moldova, enjoy autonomous status.
Gagauz autonomy was a contentious issue in 2002; In response to a series of steps that the previously elected governor and his supporters claimed involved several violations of the law, he resigned, claiming pressure from the Chisinau authorities.
The Communist-backed candidate won the special election to succeed him.
In 2000, the Moldovan Audio-Visual Council suspended broadcasting licenses of three radio stations that broadcast almost entirely in Russian, after a court decision upheld a suit brought against the stations for violating a 65 percent national language content broadcast rule.
The rule was later clarified to include only locally produced content, not material that originated in other countries and later rebroadcast.
In 2001, under the Moldovan Audio-Visual Council in the current government, the linguistic content of broadcasts ceased to be an issue.
The Council of Europe recommended in April 2002 that state-run broadcasting be made more independent.
In response, Parliament passed a new Audio-Visual Law, but the Council of Europe concluded it was insufficient, primarily because of the provision on appointment of Board members.
President Voronin has pledged to the Council of Europe that Parliament would re-visit the law.
After several years of controversy, and as part of its response to judicial decisions from the Council of Europe, the government in July 2002 registered the Metropolitan Church of Bessarabia.
Reports exist of human rights abuses by the authorities in the separatist Transnistrian region, among them discrimination against Romanian/Moldovan speakers.
Transnistrian "presidential" elections on December 9, 2001 were reportedly plagued by abuses.
The OSCE remains involved in investigating reported severe human rights abuses by Transnistrian security police in the village of Chitcani between 1992 and 1997, including severe beatings, murder, and disappearances.
Transnistrian authorities shut down a secondary school in September 2002 for using the Latin alphabet in instruction, and the head of the schools committee of parents spent fifteen days in jail.
Legal battles involving the Jehovahs Witnesses continued in Transnistria in 2002, with the Prosecutor General filing a case in June to close down the denominations local organization.
Moldova has abolished the requirement for exit visas for travel abroad but individuals wishing to emigrate must settle financial and judicial obligations before permission to emigrate is granted.
No cases of denial of permission to emigrate were reported in 2002.
Section 498A(a)(4): "respect international law and obligations and adhere to the Helsinki Final Act of the Conference on Security and Cooperation in Europe and the Charter of Paris, including the obligations to refrain from the threat or use of force and to settle disputes peacefully."
Moldova takes seriously its participation in the OSCE and its commitments under the Helsinki Final Act.
The Transnistria region of Moldova, along the Ukrainian border, remains under the control of separatist forces.
A Russian-brokered cease-fire in Transnistria has held firm since July 1992.
The cease-fire established a tripartite peacekeeping force comprised of Moldovan, Russian, and Transnistrian units that have prevented a return to the use of force in the region.
Since its election in 2001, Moldovas Communist government has made resolution of the ongoing conflict a top priority.
Nonetheless, it has been unable to make significant progress because of fundamental disagreements with the separatist authorities in Transnistria over the status of that region.
In July 2002, the mediators to the conflict the OSCE, Russia, and Ukraine presented to the parties a document which called for Moldova and Transnistria to be re-integrated as a federal state.
Subsequent negotiations on the basis of this mediators document produced some progress, but encountered repeated obstacles from the Transnistrian side.
Section 498A(a)(5): "cooperate in seeking peaceful resolution of ethnic and regional conflicts."
At the November 1999 OSCE Summit in Istanbul, Moldova reached a bilateral agreement with Russia, reflected in the Treaty on Conventional Armed Forces in Europe (CFE) Final Act and the Summit Declaration, on the withdrawal of Russian forces and equipment from the Transnistria region of Moldova.
Ahead of schedule, Russia met its commitment to withdraw from Moldova all its equipment limited by the Treaty on Conventional Armed Forces in Europe, despite significant Transnistrian opposition.
At the Istanbul Summit Russia also agreed to withdraw all of its forces based in Moldova by December 31, 2002.
Moldova has supported OSCE efforts to work with Russia, Transnistrian authorities, and OSCE experts to lay the basis for disposal of the more than 40,000 tons of munitions and approximately 40,000 small arms stored at Russian depots in Transnistria.
The U.S. and many other OSCE states have committed to assist with contributions to an OSCE Voluntary Fund to help defray the cost of destroying or removing the Russian ammunition stored in Moldova, provided all necessary accounting and verification requirements are met.
Russia did not meet its withdrawal commitments in 2002, principally due to the magnitude of the task, the obstructionism of the Transnistrians, and a lack of political will.
At the December 2002 OSCE ministerial in Porto, Russia committed to complete the withdrawal as soon as possible and stated its intent to do so by December 31, 2003.
Section 498A(a)(6): implement responsible security policies, including --
(A) adhering to arms control obligations derived from agreements signed by the former Soviet Union;
(B) reducing military forces and expenditures to a level consistent with legitimate defense requirements;
(C) not proliferating nuclear, biological, or chemical weapons, their delivery systems, or related technologies; and
(D) restraining conventional weapons transfers."
Moldova has formally declared its willingness and intent to accept all of the relevant arms control obligations of the former Soviet Union.
Moldova ratified the CFE Treaty on July 6, 1992 and the 1996 Flank Document on May 15, 1997.
Compliance with these obligations has been good.
Moldova participates in the CFE Joint Consultative Group and was an active participant in negotiations on adaptation of the CFE Treaty.
At the OSCE Summit in Istanbul, Moldova reached a bilateral agreement with the Russian Federation for withdrawal of Russian troops and equipment from Moldova according to a specified timeframe and also signed the Adapted CFE agreement.
Moldova has actively cooperated with efforts to overcome continuing problems resulting from the unwillingness of Transnistrian separatists to allow Russian force withdrawals and unimpeded CFE inspections of Russian forces located in the region.
Moldova fulfilled CFE requirements for submission of data on equipment holdings in December 1999 and 2000; it was late providing comparable data in 2001.
Moldova has submitted Confidence- and Security-Building Measures (CSBM) annual data declarations for 2001 and 2002, and has willingly undergone CSBM inspections and evaluation visits in accordance with the OSCE Vienna Document.
Moldova's armed forces are reorganizing and developing, with U.S. assistance, a peacekeeping battalion capable of interoperation with international peacekeeping forces.
This battalion will form the core of Moldova's armed forces, which have a current strength of about 7,200 troops.
The peacekeeping battalion is currently in training to participate in a peacekeeping operation with NATO-led SFOR forces.
A portion of the battalion is deployed in the Moldovan/Transnistrian security zone.
Two Moldovan staff officers are currently serving on the staff of U.S.-led Multinational Division (North) in Bosnia.
Moldova acceded to the Nuclear Non-Proliferation Treaty (NPT), as a non-nuclear-weapon state, in October 1994.
The GoM signed a safeguards agreement with the International Atomic Energy Agency on June 14, 1996, but this has not yet entered into force.
In May 2002, penalties were imposed on two Moldovan entities, under the Iran Nonproliferation Act of 2000, for the transfer of missile-related equipment to Iran.
On November 25, 2002, Moldova subscribed to the International Code of Conduct against Ballistic Missile Proliferation.
The Government of Moldova has supported international nonproliferation efforts.
Moldova has increased efforts to strengthen control over its borders, including participation by Moldovan customs and border guards in U.S.-assisted counter-proliferation programs designed to halt the flow of illicit WMD materials and conventional arms.
Moldova issued new customs stamps in September 2001, with U.S. assistance, as required subsequent to its WTO admission, in an attempt to reduce smuggling operations across and along the Transnistrian part of the Ukrainian/Moldovan border.
Moldova is also attempting to set up joint Moldovan/Ukrainian border posts on Ukrainian territory along that portion of its border with Ukraine controlled by the Transnistrian separatists to minimize smuggling.
The U.S. is continuing its efforts to cooperate with Moldova in developing Moldova's export control system, in terms of both regulatory structure and enforcement capabilities.
Moldova is a State Party to the 1993 Convention on the Prohibition of the Development, Production, Stockpiling, and Use of Chemical Weapons and on Their Destruction and in September 1997 became a member of the International Atomic Energy Agency.
The U.S. considers Moldova to be a party to the INF Treaty as a successor state to the Soviet Union.
Moldova has taken no action which would call into question its commitments to that treaty.
Moldova is not a State Party to the 1972 Convention on the Prohibition of the Development, Production and Stockpiling of Bacteriological (Biological) and Toxin Weapons and on Their Destruction.
Section 498A(a)(7): "take constructive actions to protect the international environment, prevent significant transborder pollution, and promote sustainable use of natural resources."
While information on specific "constructive actions" undertaken by the Moldovan Government to reduce cross-border pollution is limited, Moldova is taking steps to reduce overall levels of pollution.
With U.S. help, Moldova increased awareness of environmental issues by completing a biodiversity assessment and by increasing awareness of the benefits of low-till farming methods via demonstration projects.
The government announced in 2002 its intention to create Moldovas first national park.
The 55,000-hectare Lower Dniester Park project is funded by the World Bank / Global Environment Facility.
The U.S. cooperated with the EU in the creation of a Regional Environmental Center (REC) in Moldova, the mission of which is to strengthen civil society and support sustainable development by promoting public awareness and participation in environmental decision-making.
The REC successfully executed one round of small project grants to environmental NGOs.
Section 498A(a)(8): "deny support for acts of international terrorism."
The Government of Moldova does not grant sanctuary from prosecution to individuals or groups having committed acts of international terrorism or otherwise support international terrorism.
Moldova is a party to ten of the 12 international counter-terrorism conventions.
Following the September 11 attacks in the U.S., Moldova quickly passed a new anti-terrorism law that provides the legal framework for combating terrorism, sets out the rights and obligations of law enforcement agencies, and details the manner in which the agencies will be coordinated and supervised.
The Moldovan government cooperated with all USG requests on blocking terrorism financing in 2002.
Section 498A(a)(9): "accept responsibility for paying an equitable portion of the indebtedness to United States firms incurred by the former Soviet Union."
In October 1991, shortly before the Soviet Union dissolved, Russia and nine other Soviet republics signed a Memorandum of Understanding declaring themselves jointly and severally liable for the foreign debts of the Soviet Union.
In December 1991, Russia and seven other republics signed an agreement that assigned to each of the newly independent states shares of both all the external assets and all foreign debt of the former Soviet Union (FSU).
Moldova signed the October, but not the December 1991, agreement.
The December 1991 agreement provided that Moldova's share of the FSU debt would be 1.29 percent.
Beginning in 1992, Russia sought to replace the principle of joint and several liability with full liability for the debt in return for all the external assets.
On October 19, 1993, Moldova signed a "zero option" agreement with Russia under which Russia will pay Moldova's share of the FSU debt in return for Moldova's share of FSU assets as defined by the December 1991 agreement.
(Please see section 498A(a)(9) of the Russia FSA report regarding indebtedness to the United States incurred by the former Soviet Union.)
Section 498A(a)(10): "cooperate with the United States Government in uncovering all evidence regarding Americans listed as prisoners-of-war, or otherwise missing during American operations, who were detained in the former Soviet Union during the Cold War."
The U.S. effort to uncover evidence of American POWs and MIAs in the former Soviet Union is being conducted through the U.S.-Russian Joint Commission on POWs/MIAs, established in March 1992.
Moldovan officials warmly welcomed the U.S. side of the Commission in August 1995.
With the full support of the Moldovan government, the U.S. Chairman also made an appeal to the people of Moldova, asking them to come forward with information.
Moldova has also fully supported subsequent inquiries in Moldova.
Section 498A(a)(11): "terminate support for the communist regime in Cuba, including removal of troops, closing military and intelligence facilities, including the military and intelligence facilities at Lourdes and Cienfuegos, and ceasing trade subsidies and economic, nuclear, and other assistance."
We have no evidence from which to conclude that the Government of Moldova is providing military, intelligence, economic, nuclear, or other assistance to the Government of Cuba.
CHECKLIST FOR GROUNDS OF INELIGIBILITY UNDER SECTION 498A(B) OF THE FOREIGN ASSISTANCE ACT OF 1961
MOLDOVA
Section 498A(b)(1): Has the President determined that the Government of Moldova has "engaged in a consistent pattern of gross violations of internationally recognized human rights or of international law"?
No.
We do not believe that the Government of Moldova is engaged in such a pattern.
Section 498A(b)(2): Has the President determined that the Government of Moldova "has failed to take constructive actions to facilitate the effective implementation of applicable arms control obligations derived from agreements signed by the former Soviet Union"?
No.
We do not believe that the Government of Moldova has failed to take such actions.
Section 498A(b)(3): Has the President determined that, after October 24, 1992, the Government of Moldova "knowingly transferred to another country --
(A) missiles or missile technology inconsistent with the guidelines and parameters of the Missile Technology Control Regime (MCTR); or
(B) any material, equipment, or technology that would contribute significantly to the ability of such country to manufacture any weapon of mass destruction (including nuclear, chemical, and biological weapons) if the President determine(d) that the material, equipment, or technology was to be used by such country in the manufacture of such a weapon"?
No such determinations were made, however, in May 2002, penalties were imposed on two Moldovan entities, under the Iran Nonproliferation Act of 2000, for the transfer of MCTR-controlled equipment to Iran.
These penalties are specific to these private entities and do not apply to the Moldovan government.
Section 498A(b)(4): Is the Government of Moldova "prohibited from receiving such assistance by section 101 or 102 of the Arms Export Control Act or sections 306(a)(1) and 307 of the Chemical and Biological Weapons Control and Warfare Elimination Act of 1991?"
No.
We do not have information from which to conclude that the Government of Moldova is prohibited from receiving assistance under these statutes.
Section 498A(b)(5): Has the President determined and certified to the appropriate congressional committees that the Government of Moldova "is providing assistance for, or engaging in non-market based trade (as defined in section 498B(k)(3) with the Cuban government? If so, has the President taken action to withhold assistance from Moldova under the Foreign Assistance Act within 30 days of such a determination, or has Congress enacted legislation disapproving the determination within that 30-day period?"
No.
The President has not determined that the Government of Moldova is providing assistance for, or engaging in any non-market-based trade with, the Cuban Government.
CRITERIA FOR U.S. ASSISTANCE UNDER SECTION 498A(a) OF THE FOREIGN ASSISTANCE ACT OF 1961
RUSSIA
Section 201 of the FREEDOM Support Act amended Section 498A of the Foreign Assistance Act of 1961 to require that the President "take into account not only relative need but also the extent to which that independent state is acting to":
Section 498A(a)(1): "make significant progress toward, and is committed to the comprehensive implementation of, a democratic system based on principles of the rule of law, individual freedoms, and representative government determined by free and fair elections."
Russia's progress since 1991 towards building a society governed by law-based, democratic institutions has been apparent but somewhat uneven and beset by serious challenges.
However, key democratic elements are in place.
The 1993 Constitution established a governmental structure with a strong head of state (a President), a Government headed by a Prime Minister, and a bicameral legislature (Federal Assembly) consisting of the State Duma (lower house) and the Federation Council (upper house).
Both the President and the Duma were selected in competitive elections, with a broad range of political parties and movements contesting offices.
President Vladimir Putin was elected in March 2000, and Prime Minister Mikhail Kasyanov took office in May 2000.
There were concerns expressed, however, that the Kremlin unfairly used the advantages of incumbency, particularly in its use of the media, to promote Putin's candidacy.
Domestic and international observers commended the Central Election Committee for performing effectively as an independent and professional body, and, although there were some irregularities, the vast majority of polling station commissions were rated highly for their performances during the conduct of the poll.
The legislative branch consists of a bicameral Parliament, the State Duma and the Federation Council.
Duma deputies are elected by party lists and single-mandate districts.
Membership in the Federation Council was changed by recent legislation approved by the Federal Assembly and signed by the President in 2001, and is now via appointment by regional governors and the regional legislature, with the approval of the regional legislature.
Two Federation Council members are appointed from each of the 89 regional subjects of the Federation.
Duma elections, which were also judged free and fair, took place in 1993, 1995 and December 1999.
The International Election Observation Mission, a joint effort of the Organization for Security and Co-operation in Europe (OSCE), Council of Europe, and European Parliament, noted some deficiencies in the December 19, 1999 Duma elections, but judged them to have been largely free and fair.
The Mission noted that this marked significant progress for the consolidation of democracy in the Russian Federation.
The constitution provides for an independent judiciary, including a Supreme Court that hears appeals from the courts of general jurisdiction and a constitutional court.
The Government made important progress during the year in the implementation of constitutional provisions for due process, and fair and timely trial.
On December 5, 2001, the Federation Council approved the Code of Criminal Procedure, the Law on the Status of Judges, the Law on the Judicial System, and the Law on the Constitutional Court.
These laws will go into effect over a three-year period, beginning July 2002.
The new Code balances the protection of society with the rights of the individual, establishes an adversarial system rather than an inquisitorial system, and requires that all serious crime cases be tried before juries within two years in all 89 regions.
The Law on the Constitutional Court establishes the obligation of Russian legislatures to alter immediately laws found unconstitutional.
The Law on Judges makes judges more accountable for their actions and liable to criminal investigation.
The judiciary has shown signs of limited independence ruling against the government in some cases.
However, despite making progress towards reform, the judiciary continued to lack resources, suffered from corruption and remained subject to some influence from the executive, military and security forces.
The judicial system continues to be plagued by large case backlogs and trial delays, though both the number of persons in pretrial detention and the average length of time spent there has declined significantly.
Russia has yet to enact comprehensive anti-corruption legislation or to develop a multidisciplinary approach to address corruption.
The government has, however, begun to engage on the issue in multilateral fora, such as the UN, the G-8, the Council of Europe, the February 1999 Global Forum on Fighting Corruption sponsored by the U.S., and the May 2001 Global Forum II sponsored by the Dutch.
Section 498A(a)(2): "make significant progress in, and is committed to the comprehensive implementation of, economic reform based on market principles, private ownership, and integration into the world economy, including implementation of the legal and policy frameworks necessary for such reform (including protection of intellectual property and respect for contracts)."
The Russian economy has undergone tremendous stress as it has moved from a centrally planned to a free-market system.
Since 1991, Russia has succeeded in privatizing most of the formerly state-owned economy and freed business entities to trade and compete in a market where prices are generally set by supply and demand.
The Russian government officially estimates that more than 75 percent of manufacturing enterprises are fully or partially privatized.
85 percent of current manufacturing output reportedly stems from such enterprises, and more than 80 percent of Russia's industrial workers work in these firms.
The vast majority of Russia's financial sector is in private hands, with only one state-owned bank (Sberbank, which controls most retail banking) remaining from the Soviet era.
The Russian economy showed 4 percent growth in 2002, slowing somewhat from 5 percent growth in 2001.
Russia has maintained prudent macroeconomic policies, posting a primary federal budget surplus of 3 percent of GDP over the first ten months of 2002, maintaining a stable exchange rate, and accumulating international reserves of over $47 billion.
The Russian government introduced three major reforms to the tax code in 2001 -- a 13% flat income tax, a reduced corporate tax from 35% to 24%, and a streamlined, less complicated tax code with fewer loopholes.
Other major reform legislation passed in 2001-2002 included a market-oriented labor code, the majority of the provisions for a 'fully-funded' pension system, and the first elements of a package to reduce the scope of government licensing and streamline business registration and inspection.
Implementation of structural reforms has significantly accelerated under President Putin in 2001, but much remains to be done in this arena to assure Russia's sustained economic development.
Even with the economic windfalls from energy exports, slow development and uneven enforcement of securities regulation, lack of a developed real property system, lack of financing due to political and economic uncertainty, over-reliance on barter transactions and failure to enforce bankruptcy against insolvent enterprises continue to prevent the Russian economy from reaching its potential, and render it vulnerable to adverse external shocks.
In addition, resistance by the bureaucracy and other vested interests has attempted to push reforms back from their original aims, and hampered implementation, especially at the local level.
With Duma/Presidential elections in late 2003/early 2004, and remaining reforms politically sensitive, there has been some slowdown in the reform pace.
Rail and electricity restructuring legislation is likely to be delayed until spring 2003, and legislation on communal services reform has stalled.
Since 1995, Russia's trade regime has moved generally toward greater liberalization, eliminating an oil export quota and special exporter regime and export tariffs.
Russia's trade surplus, fueled by high oil prices, was $49.7 billion in 2001, but has slowed in the first half of 2002 to $26.1 billion due to rising imports.
Russia's economy -- and its federal budget -- are particularly vulnerable to the world energy markets.
The current recovery, while broader-based than just the energy sector, is built on the back of the 1998 devaluation.
Russia's economic team appears committed to a reformist agenda, but remaining reforms -- breaking up the monopolies, production sharing agreements, and more -- will be difficult.
Russian officials have recognized the connection between WTO accession and structural economic reform and reinvigorated their accession effort.
Since 1994, U.S. Presidents have determined that Russia meets the freedom of emigration stipulations to the Jackson-Vanik amendment to the Trade Act of 1974, allowing Russia to receive Normal Trade Relations status.
Although the government has officially welcomed foreign investment, the Duma is considering laws that would limit foreign investment in some service sectors, including insurance, auditing, tourism and some sectors connected to national security.
Russia joined the Asia-Pacific Economic Cooperation group in 1998.
While the government is committed to further integration into the world economy, making the necessary reforms has proved politically difficult.
Russia's intellectual property rights (IPR) legislation provides protection for patents, copyrights, trade and service marks, and semiconductor chip designs.
Legislation introduced in 2001 reflects Russian efforts to prepare for World Trade Organization (WTO) accession and the IPR commitments of the WTO Agreement on Trade-related Aspects of Intellectual Property Rights (TRIPS).
The legislation includes retroactive protection of copyrights, but includes alterations to the civil code that may confuse rights holders when pursuing claims against pirates.
The Duma is still considering this legislation.
Pervasive problems remain in enforcement, and piracy of optical media increased dramatically in 2002.
Partially in response to this increase, the GOR set up an IPR task force led by Prime Minister Kasyanov in the fall of 2002.
One of the first steps taken by the commission were police raids in late November on three pirate plants operating on land leased from the military in Moscow, Moscow Oblast, and Yekaterinburg, netting more than 250,000 pirated CDs, DVDs and videos worth millions of dollars.
Russia remains on the U.S. Special 301 priority watch list.
In 1998, Russia established a Patent Chamber, a specialized court for appellate review of patent disputes
Section 498A(a)(3): "respect internationally recognized human rights, including the rights of minorities and the rights to freedom of religion and emigration."
Russia's constitution guarantees respect for internationally recognized human rights, and its government generally respected the human rights of its citizens, but serious problems remained in many areas.
Although the Russian parliament has been slow to pass implementing legislation in many areas, the Constitutional guarantees of freedoms of speech, press, religion, assembly and movement have dramatically recast the individual's relationship with the state in Russia compared with the Soviet period.
Institutions and democratic practices are evolving but are not fully developed.
Despite the continued wide diversity of the press, government pressure on the media increased during the year.
There were continuing, credible reports of widespread human rights violations by Russian troops in Chechnya, who demonstrated little respect for basic human rights.
(Chechnya is further addressed in the following section (a)(4).)
The treatment of prisoners and conditions in pretrial detention facilities and prisons also were generally poor.
Freedom of expression and of the media is now well established in Russia, with the print and broadcast media reflecting a far wider diversity of political views than under the Soviet period.
Nevertheless, cases of government pressure on the media continued.
Television station NTVs coverage of the October 2002 Moscow theater hostage crisis, for example, generated criticism by Russian officials, including President Putin.
There was some evidence of efforts by top Kremlin officials to bring NTV under stricter state control.
On the positive side, President Putins late November veto of proposed amendments to the Law on Mass Media which would have greatly restricted coverage of counterterrorist operations and extremist activity was widely greeted by Russian media and human rights groups.
There have been several prosecutions in relation to so-called "espionage" cases that appear to be politically motivated.
Several of these cases have involved Russians and foreigners working together and exchanging information that the authorities considered sensitive.
For example, Russian military journalist Grigoriy Pasko, who had reported on the Russian navy's dumping of nuclear waste, was convicted in 2001 of one count of espionage in a case that led many human rights activists and Russian politicians to question the apparent undue influence of the Federal Security Service (FSB) and judicial independence.
Some journalists have been killed and kidnapped and the government has failed to investigate these crimes actively, in the eyes of some observers.
In another case, arms control researcher Igor Sutyagin remained in pre-trial detention at years end.
The Russian Constitution prohibits discrimination based on race, sex, religion, language, social status, or other circumstances.
However, both official and societal discrimination still exists.
There continue to be credible reports that law enforcement agents in Moscow routinely detained, intimidated and extorted money from and beat people of color, mainly people from the Caucasus and Central Asia.
Police and other security forces in various parts of Russia continue their practice of targeting citizens from the Caucasus and darker-skinned persons in general for arbitrary searches and detentions on the pretext of fighting crime and enforcing residential registration requirements.
Human rights groups in Moscow have complained of increased detentions of people from the Caucasus, who have come under intense police scrutiny following the October 2002 terrorist attack on the Dubrovka Theater.
On the positive side, both Putin and Moscow Mayor Luzhkov have made strong, repeated public statements on the unacceptability of collective punishment, and the need to respect Chechens civil rights.
Although religious freedom has greatly expanded in Russia since the end of the Soviet Union, with a variety of faiths experiencing new opportunities and gaining new adherents, the last year has seen increasing pressure on religious minorities, especially Roman Catholics.
In September 1997, President Yeltsin signed a law On Freedom of Conscience and Religious Associations that replaced a more liberal law on religious freedom and introduced significantly more government regulation over religious organizations.
Russian officials pledged that implementation of the law would be consistent with Russias international commitments to religious freedom and have taken some steps to ameliorate some of the law's negative aspects, but the Ministry of Justice acknowledges closing almost 1000 (980) groups by mid-year.
Some of these were already defunct, but some were active and unable to re-register.
At first the federal government generally attempted to apply the 1997 law liberally, and most allegations of restrictive practices were directed at local officials.
However, there is evidence that the Procurator General has encouraged local state prosecutors to challenge the registration and re-registration of some "non-traditional" religious groups.
The vagueness of the law and regulations, contradictions between federal and local law, and varying interpretations of the law have furnished regional officials with a pretext to restrict the activities of religious minorities.
Many of those groups initially denied registration have been evangelical, proselytizing groups.
In some cases they have successfully sued and the courts have ordered local officials to register them.
All but one of the organizations required to re-register at the federal level did so.
About 90 percent of the estimated 20,000 organizations required to re-register at the local level did so successfully, and many of those that did not are apparently defunct.
Officials in Moscow and other cities have repeatedly attempted to ban local branches of the Salvation Army, the Jehovah's Witnesses, and Scientologists, so far without success.
Some religious groups have experienced harassment either from official sources, such as the FSB and local officials, or unofficial sources, such as extremists.
Roman Catholic clergy came under renewed pressure in 2002, when five foreign-born priests and a bishop one of only four Catholic bishops serving in Russia had their visas cancelled or were forced to leave Russia when their current visas expired and their visa applications denied.
The denials of visas to Roman Catholic clergy raised strong concerns over the influence of the security services and the Russian Orthodox Church and had a chilling effect on Russias Catholic community, which depends on clergy from abroad.
Some Evangelical Protestants, Buddhists, and Muslim religious workers and clergy also were denied visas or visa-renewals.
Federal authorities have issued directives to bring local laws on religious registration and non-complying regions into line with the federal law.
The U.S. government and NGO community are monitoring this closely and have raised these issues with Russian officials at the highest levels.
Muslims, Jews and members of other religious minority groups continue to encounter societal prejudices, antagonism, and discrimination.
With the continuing conflict in Chechnya and more recently the international war on terrorism, societal discrimination and harassment against Muslims is frequently reported.
President Putin and other officials have called for greater tolerance and specifically have condemned anti-Semitic acts, especially during last summers rash of anti-Semitic bomb attacks and threats.
President Putin has spoken out publicly on the need to protect religious freedom, promote tolerance, and preserve the separation of church and state.
While many groups have noted improvements in certain respects over the past year, societal discrimination, harassment, and violence against members of some religious minorities remain a problem.
Lack of respect for due process remains a serious shortcoming.
Russian prisoner's rights groups have documented cases in which members of the security forces tortured and beat detainees and prisoners, and in 1998 the Presidents Permanent Human Rights Chamber found that torture was widespread and systematic, especially in the pre-trial phase.
There is little accountability for such abuses.
Although suspects were once routinely detained for 12-18 months in pre-trial detention centers, implementation of the new Code of Criminal Procedure has dramatically reduced both the amount of time prisoners spend in pre-trial detention and the overall numbers in detention.
Pre-trial detention conditions there have improved somewhat, although both there and in regular prisons they remain deplorable.
Criminal procedures in regions where juries have not been introduced are still weighted heavily in favor of the prosecution.
The new Criminal Procedure Code passed by the Federation Council in December 2001 shifts the criminal justice system from an inquisitorial to an adversarial system and places the once powerful Russian procuracy on roughly the same legal footing as the defendant.
The Code also calls for jury trials to be held nationwide for most serious crimes.
There were some cases in which the courts ruled against the government, suggesting that the law was becoming an increasingly important tool for those seeking to protect human rights, but serious problems remain.
In addition, the judiciary was subject to manipulation by central and local political authorities and was plagued by large case backlogs and trial delays.
Tens of thousands of Russian citizens emigrate annually.
In FY 1998, the latest statistics available, approximately 11,500 Russian citizens emigrated to the United States.
The number of state secrecy and other cases on the listings of "refuseniks" maintained by the American Jewish organizations has decreased from over 1,000 in the late 1980s to 13 in 2002.
Some regional governments severely restrict the constitutional right of citizens to freely choose their place of residence by requiring residence permits to live and work in a specific area.
These restrictions, though repeatedly challenged in court, remain largely in force and are tolerated by the Federal Government.
The presence of these restrictions, which increased following terrorist bombings in September 1999 and were reinvigorated following an explosion in Moscow in August 2000, demonstrated the continued obstacles to the enforcement of judicial rulings.
Citizens may freely travel within Russia, but must carry internal passports.
Citizens are free to emigrate.
However, individuals who, during the course of their work, had access to classified material can be refused permission to travel abroad for five years following the last date of access to such material.
The law allows for an additional period of five years, although in practice, restrictions of more than five years are rarely imposed.
Section 498A(a)(4): "respect international law and obligations and adhere to the Helsinki Final Act of the Conference on Security and Cooperation in Europe and the Charter of Paris, including the obligations to refrain from the threat or use of force and to settle disputes peacefully."
Responding to attacks on Dagestan in July and August 1999 by extremist Chechen field commander Shamil Basayev, and to the bombing of apartment buildings in Moscow and elsewhere, the Russian government launched a military campaign to assert control over Chechnya.
Three years later, the conduct of Russian armed forces in the campaign against Chechen rebels continues to be poor.
The indiscriminate use of force by both government and rebel troops resulted in widespread civilian casualties and the displacement of more than 100,000 people, the majority of whom sought refuge in the neighboring republic of Ingushetiya.
There were numerous credible reports of human rights abuses and atrocities committed by both federal and Chechen forces, including extrajudicial killings, torture, rape, disappearance and arbitrary detention.
Such actions are not consistent with Russias international commitments under international humanitarian law and/or the OSCEs Code of Conduct on politico-military aspects of security, which provides that states should take due care to avoid injury to civilians or their property.
Despite General Moltenskoy's March 2002 Decree #80, which was designed to improve the conduct of Russian forces in Chechnya, command and control amongst military and special police units often appeared to be weak, and a culture of lawlessness and corruption has flourished.
This culture fostered individual acts of violence and looting against civilians and a lack of accountability.
While government prosecutors have ostensibly pursued investigations of some of these incidents, few cases have been brought to court.
According to press reports, 34 servicemen were convicted of various crimes, although some were amnestied.
In the most highly publicized case, the Military Prosecutor's office acquitted on the grounds of temporary insanity Colonel Yuriy Budanov on charges of abducting and murdering a young Chechen woman.
This represents a major disappointment and refusal by the Russian Government to assure the accountability of Russian forces in Chechnya.
There have been no reliable mechanisms to investigate and prosecute abuses purportedly committed by Chechen separatists.
Chechen fighters have reportedly used landmines, booby traps and other explosive devices that sometimes have caused civilian casualties, and they have carried out numerous assassinations of local civilian officers serving in the pro-Moscow Chechen administration.
The OSCE maintains an Assistance Group (AG) in Chechnya whose mandate includes human rights monitoring and facilitating delivery of humanitarian assistance.
In November 2002, the Russian delegation to the OSCE proposed far-reaching changes to the Assistance Groups mandate.
The changes would, if implemented, greatly reduce the AGs political and human rights dimension and largely restrict it to assisting the Russian government in its efforts to restore Chechnya economically and to facilitating the return of refugees.
The U.S., together with other OSCE member states, accepts enlarging the AGs economic dimension in response to Russias request, but insists that the AGs role in monitoring human rights be preserved.
In a September 2001 speech, President Putin differentiated between Chechen separatists and "terrorists," creating an opening for contacts between the Russians and Chechen President Maskhadov.
However, while Putin's representative and Maskhadov's envoy met face-to
